CIK: 856982
Company Name: MERIT MEDICAL SYSTEMS INC
Form Type : 10-K
Filing Date: 2017-03-01
Accession Number: 0000856982-17-000011


Item 1 Business. The Company Merit Medical Systems, Inc. is a leading manufacturer and marketer of disposable medical devices used in a vast array of interventional, diagnostic and therapeutic medical procedures, particularly in cardiology, radiology and endoscopy. Our mission is to be the most customer focused company in healthcare. Each day we are determined to make a difference by understanding our customers needs, and innovating and delivering a diverse range of products that improve the lives of people and communities throughout the world. We fundamentally believe that long term value is created for our customers, employees, shareholders, and communities when we focus outward and are determined to deliver an exceptional customer experience. Merit Medical Systems, Inc. was founded in 1987 by Fred P. Lampropoulos, Kent W. Stanger, Darla Gill and William Padilla. Initially we focused our operations on injection and insert molding of plastics, and electronic and sensor based technologies. Our first product was a specialized control syringe used to inject contrast solution into a patient's arteries for a diagnostic cardiac procedure called an angiogram. Since that time, our sales and product lines have expanded substantially, both through internal research and development projects and strategic acquisitions. Our business strategy focuses on four target areas as follows enhancing growth and profitability through research and development, sales model optimization, strategic acquisitions and alliances, cost discipline, and operational focus; optimizing our operational capability through lean processes, cost effective environments, and asset utilization; targeting high growth, high return opportunities by understanding, innovating, acquiring and delivering in peripheral, cardiac, interventional oncology and spine, and endoscopy product groups; and maintaining a highly disciplined, customer focused enterprise guided by strong core values to globally address unmet or underserved healthcare needs. We conduct our operations through a number of domestic and foreign subsidiaries. Our principal offices are located at 1600 West Merit Parkway, South Jordan, Utah, 84095, and our teleph1 number is (801) 253 1600. See Item 2 Properties. We maintain an Internet website at www.merit.com. Products We design, develop, market, and manufacture, through our own operations and contract manufacturers, approximately 180 innovative medical products (classified into more than 20,000 individual product catalog numbers) that offer a high level of quality, value and safety to our customers, as well as the patients they serve. Our products are used in the following clinical areas diagnostic and interventional cardiology; interventional radiology; neurointerventional radiology and surgery; vascular, general and thoracic surgery; electrophysiology; cardiac rhythm management; interventional pulmonology; interventional nephrology; orthopaedic spine surgery; interventional oncology and pain management; outpatient access centers; computed tomography; ultrasound; and interventional gastroenterology. The success of our products is enhanced by the extensive experience of our management team in the healthcare industry, our experienced direct sales force and distributors, our ability to provide custom procedural solutions such as kits, trays and procedural packs at the request of our customers, and our dedication to offering facility unique solutions in the markets we serve worldwide. We currently conduct our business through 2 business segments cardiovascular and endoscopy. Within those business segments, we offer products focused in four core product groups peripheral intervention, cardiac intervention, interventional oncology and spine, and endoscopy. A number of our products are marketed within each product group; accordingly, we do not maintain separate measures of profitability by product group. Based on industry data and our internal market information, we estimate that the addressable market opportunities (in terms of annual net sales), that we are targeting with our current or newly released product portfolios, for each of our business segments are as follows 3 Table of Contents Cardiovascular $5.11 billion (global) Endoscopy $411 million (U.S. domestic) However, we operate in a competitive environment with many companies seeking to address the same market opportunities. Additionally, these opportunities may evolve significantly as a result of changes in customer preferences or the macroeconomic and regulatory environments in which we operate. For these and other reasons, we cannot guarantee the degree to which we will be able to realize increased net sales as a result of these, or any other, opportunities. For information relating to our business segments, see Note 12 to our consolidated financial statements set forth in Item 8 of this report. During the year ended December 31, 2016, net sales generated by our top ten selling products accounted for approximately 39% of our total net sales. Sales of our inflation devices accounted for approximately 12%, 14% and 16% of our net sales for the years ended December 31, 2014, 2015 and 2016, respectively. Peripheral Intervention We strive to provide our customers, the healthcare providers, with superior products designed to alleviate patient suffering from peripheral vascular and non vascular diseases. These technologies support the minimally invasive diagnosis and treatment of diseases in peripheral vessels and organs throughout the body excluding the heart. Our Peripheral Intervention product line is organized into product portfolios as follows Access, Angiography, Intervention, Drainage & Biopsy and Complete Procedural Solutions. Peripheral Access Portfolio We offer a broad line of devices used to gain and maintain vascular access. These products include access systems such as the micropuncture family kits consisting of the PAK (pedal access kit), the MAK (mini access kit) and the S MAK (stiff MAK). Additionally, our extensive line of Prelude sheath introducers and related products provide clinicians with smooth, convenient, and less traumatic access to the patient's vasculature. The Prelude Short Sheath provides vascular access to dialysis grafts, along with our extensive line of micro access devices such as the MAK and S MAK lines of mini access kits. We also offer a wide range of guide wires, diagnostic catheters, therapeutic infusion systems and safety products that can be used during dialysis related procedures. In December 2016, we entered into a strategic partnership with Bluegrass Vascular Technologies, and we acquired the global distribution rights with respect to the Surfacer Inside Out Access Catheter System. The Surfacer system, which recently received CE mark approval, is an innovative Inside Out approach to restore access to the right internal jugular vein and to preserve treatment options in hemodialysis patients with occluded veins. Additionally, the Surfacer system aligns with our existing peripheral access portfolio. In February 2016, we acquired the HeRO (Hemodialysis Reliable Outflow) Graft from CryoLife, Inc. ("Cryolife"). The HeRO Graft is a fully subcutaneous vascular access system intended for use in maintaining long term vascular access for chronic hemodialysis patients who have failing fistulas, grafts or are catheter dependent due to a central venous blockage. The Super HeRO Adapter and its accompanying HeRO Ally Revision Kit are the newest addition to our growing HeRO family of dialysis devices. This technology offers surgeons the safety and efficiency of the original HeRO graft, but with more graft options to choose from, including early cannulation grafts, which can eliminate the need for a bridging catheter. The CentrosFLO Long Term Hemodialysis Catheters anchor our chronic dialysis line. With its self centering distal tip design, the CentrosFLO is designed to maintain long term patency, as shown by retrospective and prospective studies published in 2016. We also offer the ProGuide Chronic Dialysis Catheter, a workhorse catheter for chronic dialysis. We offer perit1al dialysis catheters, accessories and implantation kits as part of our dialysis access product line, including the Flex Neck and ExxTended Perit1al Dialysis Catheters. Additionally, we have expanded our perit1al dialysis portfolio to include an implantation system for an over the wire catheter placement technique familiar to interventionists. Angiography Portfolio We market an extensive line of diagnostic and hydrophilic guide wires for use in angiography procedures. Our diagnostic guide wires are used to traverse the vascular anatomy and aid in placing catheters and therapeutic devices to their target location. Our Merit Laureate Hydrophilic Guide Wire has a consistent, lubricious coating intended to promote rapid advancement through the vasculature, provide additional assistance for crossing difficult lesions, and facilitate smooth catheter exchanges by minimizing 4 Table of Contents friction. Additionally, our pre coated, high performance InQwire Diagnostic Guide Wires are lubricious and available in a wide range of configurations designed to meet clinicians' diagnostic needs. We have strengthened our angiography portfolio with the addition of the SPINR high performance guidewire controller. The SPINR is a mechanical torque device used to access distal anatomy by navigating tortuous vessels, crossing old lesions, and working through fresh blockages. This guidewire controller bridges the gap between manual torque devices and electromechanical torque devices. The diagnosis and treatment of peripheral arterial disease is paramount to ensuring appropriate patient care and helping patients achieve an enduring, productive lifestyle. The Performa and Impress Diagnostic Catheter product lines are designed to provide solutions for traversing difficult peripheral vasculature during angiographic procedures. These catheters work in tandem with our guide wires to aid in the diagnosis of peripheral artery disease and can be used to facilitate transradial access, a procedure which uses the wrist artery as the access entry point for peripheral procedures rather than the more traditional femoral artery approach. Intervention Portfolio We market an extensive line of products designed to treat blood clots that obstruct the flow of blood in arteries and veins. Our therapeutic thrombolytic infusion systems include the Fountain Infusion System and the Mistique Infusion Catheter. These catheters are used to treat thrombus, or blood clots, in the peripheral vessels of the body, as well as native dialysis fistula and synthetic grafts. We offer standard and low profile ASAP Aspiration Catheters, which offer clinicians 2 options for the safe and efficient removal of fresh, soft emboli and thrombi from vessels. For crossing tight, difficult lesions, we market our line of Merit SureCross Support Catheters. Our SureCross catheters offer trackability, pushability and visibility utilized by physicians to cross partial and total chronic occlusions in the peripheral arteries. Our vascular retrieval devices are single use products designed for foreign body manipulation and retrieval and can be used to retrieve inferior vena cava filters, reposition indwelling venous catheters, strip fibrin sheath formation, and assist in recanalization of both arterial and venous chronic occlusions. In 2015, our EN Snare Endovascular Snare System was enhanced and launched with a new robust delivery catheter and peel away insertion tool to simplify the snare deployment process and increase reliability during use. For more than 2 decades, we have offered inflation devices designed to accurately measure pressures during balloon and stent deployment. We offer the basixTOUCH Inflation Device for 1 handed preparation and priming for faster preparation time. Many procedures today require high pressures. For these procedures, we are proud to offer the basixTOUCH40 . Its 40 ATM (standard atmosphere) pressure capacity allows inflation of high pressure interventional balloons. Additionally, the BasixCompak Inflation Device and the Blue Diamond Digital Inflation Device feature an angled gauge for better viewing. In 2016, we introduced the Advocate Peripheral Angioplasty Balloon product line intended for balloon dilation or percutaneous transluminal angioplasty of the iliac, femoral, popliteal, infra popliteal and renal arteries. The Advocate ThinTek technology produces a thin walled, yet strong balloon material allowing improved crossability, superior tracking and pushability, and improved rewrap. Drainage & Biopsy Portfolio We have a broad line of drainage access products. Our 1 Step Drainage Catheter, Safety Paracentesis Procedure Tray and Thoracentesis and Paracentesis Set are designed to provide clinicians with safe, convenient and cost effective methods for removing unwanted fluid accumulation. Our Valved 1 Step Centesis Catheters are designed with an integrated self sealing valve to minimize the risk of air entering the pleural space and to prevent fluid leakage during thoracentesis and paracentesis procedures. The ReSolve Locking Drainage Catheter offers a convenient locking mechanism that we believe enhances patient comfort. A range of catheter fixation devices are also available including the StayFIX Fixation Device and the Revolution Catheter Securement Device, which were designed to save time, enhance patient comfort and improve cost effectiveness. We provide a wide selection of accessories that complement our drainage catheters, including tubing sets and drainage bags. For non vascular applications, the mini access kit (MAK NV ) is designed for easy visualization and quick access into the drainage area. For enhanced visibility, the kit features an echo enhanced needle and radiopaque marker tip on the introducer. 5 Table of Contents In January 2017, we launched the CorVocet Biopsy System. This exciting new product is designed to cut full core of tissue, providing large specimens for pathological examination. Its sleek lines, light weight, and ergonomic grip help facilitate 1 handed priming, positioning, and deployment, which is especially beneficial during image guided procedures. Complete Procedural Solutions We offer a variety of pre arranged kits, trays and packs to meet our customers' specific needs. We work closely with our customers to create a customized assortment of products designed to meet their needs and improve patient outcomes. Our Vein Closure Tray is 1 example of how we can help streamline procedural efficiency and reduce costs by combining the clinical tools needed in 1 convenient package. Merit Disposal Depot waste bags fully contain fluid waste for easy disposal and come in many configurations for connecting directly to a manifold or for convenient placement on a back table. In response to the growing demand for hemostasis valves that provide for minimized blood loss and reduced exposure to blood, we have made available a full line of hemostasis valves in a variety of sizes and options that allow hospitals and physicians to choose products that reflect their procedural preferences. Cardiac Intervention We manufacture and sell a variety of products designed to aid in the treatment of various cardiac conditions specific to interventional cardiology and electrophysiology including cardiac rhythm management and lead management. 2 key program drivers in cardiac intervention during 2016 were the Think Radial Program and Think Interventional CRT , which stands for cardiac resychronization therapy. Think Radial is a global education program that provides clinicians with the training and tools to commence or further their practice of the transradial approach. The transradial approach uses the artery in the wrist as the entry point for either cardiac catheterization or peripheral procedures, rather than the more traditional femoral artery in the groin. In 2016, we hosted several Think Radial training courses at our facilities for interventional cardiologists and interventional radiologists from across the U.S., Europe, and Canada. The Think Interventional CRT therapy training program showcases a new interventional approach to implanting left ventricle leads. This approach utilizes new products and offers techniques to electrophysiologists who are relatively new to telescoping support catheters, subclavian vein venoplasty, and using snares to provide guidewire support. In 2016, our Think Interventional CRT training programs globally assisted with the training and education of electrophysiologists from across the U.S., Europe, and Canada. Our Cardiac Intervention product group is organized under product portfolios which include Access, Angiography, Hemostasis, Intervention, Custom Procedural Solutions, and Electrophysiology. Cardiac Access Portfolio We offer a broad line of devices used to gain and maintain vascular access for cardiology procedures, including needles, scalpels, hemostasis devices, arm boards and sheath introducers. Our line of Prelude Sheath Introducers is designed to provide clinicians with quick and convenient access to the patient's vasculature. The PreludeEASE Hydrophilic Sheath Introducer is our anchor product for cardiologists, designed to provide access to the radial artery while minimizing the potential for spasm with a hydrophilic coating that extends to the tip of the sheath. To provide a more complete offering for radial access procedures, we offer the Rad Board family of products. The Rad Board is designed to provide x ray protection and radiation protection to physicians, provide a larger work space for physicians and an area for patients to rest their arms during radial procedures. Cardiac Angiography Portfolio For angiography procedures, we market guide wires, fluid management and tubing, manifolds, syringes, transducers and diagnostic catheters. We offer the Performa line of diagnostic catheters for these procedures. We believe that these catheters offer physicians superior torque, high shaft strength for pushability and a large inner diameter for improved flow rates during a variety of angiographic procedures. Our MIV Radial Ventriculogram Pigtail Catheter addresses the difficulty in accessing the left ventricle from the radial artery, which occurs when using standard femoral approach catheters. 6 Table of Contents Cardiac Hemostasis Portfolio Catheterization for diagnostic and interventional cardiology procedures generally takes 1 of 2 approaches, femoral or radial. We offer products to assist clinicians in obtaining and maintaining hemostasis following arterial catheterization by either approach. For hemostasis of the femoral artery, we offer the Safeguard Pressure Assisted Device and for hemostasis of the radial artery, we now offer the PreludeSYNC TM hemostasis device, as well as our legacy Safeguard Radial TM device. These devices compete in a fast growing segment within the interventional cardiology and radial compression markets. The PreludeSYNC was designed to address the market need for improved patient comfort and clinician use without compromising safety. To accomplish this, the device has a soft band with a secure hook and loop closure. To improve patient experience, the device comes packaged with creative, unique designs printed directly on the band, which is a first of its kind for our company. We have developed a broad line of clinically acclaimed hemostasis valves, MAP Merit Angioplasty Packs and angioplasty accessories. Hemostasis valves connect to catheters and allow passage of additional guide wires, balloon catheters and other devices into the vasculature, while reducing the amount of blood loss during the procedures. Our hemostasis valve line includes the Honor , PhD , AccessPLUS , Access 9 , DoublePlay , MBA , PhD and the Passage . Cardiac Intervention Portfolio Since our introduction of the CCS Coronary Control Syringe line in 1988, we have continued to develop innovative, problem solving devices, accessories, kits and procedure trays for use during minimally invasive diagnosis and treatment of coronary and peripheral artery disease. We now offer a broad range of specialty syringes, including color coded Medallion Syringes and the VacLok Vacuum Pressure Syringe. Additionally, we offer an extensive line of kits containing fluid management products such as syringes, manifolds, stopcocks, tubing, and disposable pressure transducers (Meritrans ) for measurement of pressures within the vessels and chambers of the heart. The TRAM and TRAM P Manifolds with Integral Transducers combine a low torque manifold with the transducer. We also provide devices, kits and procedure trays designed to effectively and safely manage fluids, contrast media and waste during angiography and interventional procedures. The Miser Contrast Management System complements our comprehensive line of fluid management products used in angiography procedures. For more than 2 decades, we have offered an extensive line of inflation devices designed to accurately measure pressures during balloon and stent deployment. The basixTOUCH Inflation Syringe reduces preparation time through its single handed preparation and priming features. The Blue Diamond Digital Inflation Device features an angled gauge for better viewing. Additionally, our IntelliSystem and Monarch Inflation Devices (state of the art digital inflation systems), as well as the BasixCOMPAK Inflation Syringe, offer clinicians a wide range of features and prices. During coronary catheterization procedures, guiding catheters are used to gain access to the heart. Our line of Concierge Guiding Catheters has an advanced braiding technology and proprietary polymer blend shaft, which allow for an increased lumen size while maintaining exceptional support. Pericardiocentesis is a procedure through which fluid is aspirated from the pericardial sac (the sac enveloping the heart). Our pericardiocentesis kit is designed as an organized, ready to use, convenient tray to assist the clinician in draining fluid quickly from the pericardial sac. For angiography and angioplasty procedures we offer the Ostial PRO Stent Positioning System, a medical grade disposable guide wire system designed to provide consistent and precise stent implantation in aorto ostial lesions during coronary or peripheral interventional procedures. Additional angiographic accessories include the Flow Control Switch , an integrated, 1 handed, single channel switch designed with clinician and patient safety in mind. Cardiac Custom Procedural Solutions Portfolio Custom procedural solutions ( CPS ) products are critical products used in angiographic procedures. Our CPS products consist of kits, packs and trays. Our ShortStop and ShortStop Advantage Temporary Sharps Holders address the potential safety issues associated with accidental needle sticks. Our extensive line of color coded Medallion Syringes and the PAL Pen and Label Medication Labeling System comply with the latest patient safety initiatives of The Joint Commission and are designed to minimize errors in administering medication. We also offer waste management products to help avoid accidental exposure to contaminated fluids. These include our Occupational Safety and Health Administration ( OSHA ) compliant waste disposal basins the BackStop , BackStop+ , MiniStop , MiniStop+ , and DugOut . These products have been designed to complement other Merit devices and are included in many of our kits and procedure trays to make the clinical setting safer for the clinician, staff and patient. 7 Table of Contents Electrophysiology Portfolio We offer innovative solutions to address lead implantation and therapeutic delivery in the rapidly expanding cardiac rhythm management and electrophysiology markets. Cardiac rhythm management ( CRM ) is the field of cardiac disease therapy that relates to the diagnosis and treatment of cardiac arrhythmias or the improper beating of the heart. Our CRM products include the Classic Sheath Splittable Hemostatic Introducer System for the insertion of cardiac pacer leads for pacemakers and implantable cardioverter defibrillators. In 2016, we launched the Prelude SNAP Hydrophilic Sheath, which is a hydrophilic coated splittable, hemostatic sheath providing the same features and benefits as our Prelude SNAP but with a hydrophilic coating for improved insertion. We also offer the Worley Advanced LV Delivery System to aid in the insertion and implantation of left ventricular leads, which are wire electrodes inserted into the coronary sinus to the left lateral wall of the heart to pace the left side of the heart for heart failure patients. The Worley Advanced LV Delivery System has been shown to reduce lead failure, improve target lead location and reduce procedure times. Electrophysiology ("EP ") is the study of diagnosing and treating the abnormal electrical activities of the heart. Common EP procedures include diagnostic EP studies and therapeutic ablation procedures designed to deter arrhythmia. We offer the HeartSpan Transseptal Needle, which is designed with a larger ergonomic handle, unique unibody needle design and optimal needle sharpness; the HeartSpan Transseptal Sheath, which features an improved hemostasis valve for reduced blood loss and air embolism, smooth sheath to dilator transition for easier transseptal crossing, and reinforced stainless steel tubing for excellent torque response. The HeartSpan Steerable Sheath Introducer is designed to reduce the risk of atrial wall perforation when navigating cardiac chambers. Interventional Oncology & Spine In July 2016, we acquired DFINE, Inc., which was headquartered in San Jose, California ("DFINE"). In connection with the acquisition, we formed a new product group, Interventional Oncology & Spine. The DFINE acquisition added a line of vertebral augmentation products for the treatment of vertebral compression fractures ("VCF") as well as medical devices used to treat metastatic spine tumors. Our Interventional Oncology & Spine product group has been developed to enable greater focus on the broad range of products and is segmented into five portfolios VCF, ablation, oncology, embolotherapy, and delivery systems. Vertebral Compression Fractures Portfolio VCFs occur when a vertebra cracks, fractures or collapses due to osteoporosis or cancer. VCFs can be extremely painful and have debilitating effects on a patient quality of life. Using our StabiliT System, physicians treat VCFs by inserting small instruments through the skin into the fractured vertebra. B1 cement is injected through a hollow needle into the fractured b1 Our StabiliT System is a comprehensive treatment system and includes access instruments, osteotomes, introducers, b1 cement and corresponding mixing and delivery systems. Ablation Portfolio We offer our STAR Tumor Ablation System to cancer patients for the palliative treatment of painful metastatic tumors. Targeted radiofrequency ablation using the STAR System offers patients pain relief and improved quality of life in a minimally invasive treatment. This procedure requires an articulating radiofrequency, or RF, device to be placed through the skin into the vertebral body and inserted directly into the tumor to ablate the tumor. Thermocouples embedded in the RF device allow for constant monitoring of the temperature directly in the ablation z1, which is a key feature when performing ablations near vital structures like the spinal cord. The STAR system includes ablation instruments, introducers, osteotomes and our MetaSTAR RF Generator. Oncology Portfolio In the United States, we sell QuadraSphere Microspheres for the treatment of hypervascularized tumors, including hepatoma and arteriovenous malformations. Malignant hepatoma, also known as hepatocellular carcinoma ( HCC ), is a common cancer and the third leading cause of cancer deaths worldwide. QuadraSphere Microspheres are precisely calibrated and designed to offer controlled, targeted embolization, treating HCC by stopping the blood flow to the tumors. In Europe, as well as Brazil, Russia, and other emerging markets, we offer HepaSphere Microspheres for delivery of chemotherapy drugs in the treatment of primary and metastatic liver cancer. 8 Table of Contents Embolotherapy Portfolio We offer Embosphere Microspheres to treat hypervascularized tumors, including symptomatic uterine fibroids, and arteriovenous malformations in the United States as well as Europe and other international markets. Additionally, in certain markets outside of the U.S., we offer Embosphere Microspheres for hemostatic embolization and embolization of the prostatic arteries for the treatment of symptomatic benign prostatic hyperplasia. We also offer embolic particles, namely our Bearing nsPVA , globally for the treatment of hypervascularized tumors, including symptomatic uterine fibroids and vascular malformations. Delivery Systems Portfolio To enhance the ability to safely perform procedures in small vessels, we manufacture a variety of microcatheters for the controlled and selective infusion of diagnostic, embolic, or therapeutic agents into vessels. In 2016, we introduced our newest microcatheter, the SwiftNINJA , which articulates up to 180 degrees in opposing directions. This articulating feature allows physicians to treat diseases that in the past would have been too difficult to access due to challenging patient anatomies. We continue to offer our Merit Maestro Microcatheter, which has a swan neck design that allows physicians to "seat" the catheter in the vessel. The SwiftNINJA can be used for the controlled and selective infusion of diagnostic, embolic, or therapeutic materials into vessels. It is compatible with many key configurations of Embosphere , Quadrasphere , HepaSphere Bearing nsPVA , and other competitive embolic products. Endoscopy Our endoscopy division, Merit Endotek, integrates advanced non vascular stent technology with balloon dilators, inflation devices, guide wires, procedure kits, and other devices that are used by endoscopists in interventional gastroenterology and interventional pulmonology, and thoracic and general surgeons. Merit Endotek has a dedicated marketing and sales organization serving these growing markets. Merit Endotek sells a variety of non vascular stents, including AERO and AERO DV Fully Covered Tracheobronchial Stents. These covered, self expanding nitinol stents are used by interventional pulmonologists and thoracic surgeons to treat strictures and fistulae in the airways, and to offer palliation to patients suffering from strictures caused by cancer. The AEROmini fully covered bronchial stent was launched in 2015 and features a low profile delivery system designed to provide additional flexibility, and aid in the accurate placement of stents in difficult airway anatomy. Merit Endotek's esophageal stents, the Alimaxx ES and the EndoMAXX fully covered esophageal stents, are used by interventional gastroenterologists, otolaryngologists and thoracic surgeons to palliate symptoms associated with malignant tumors and strictures affecting the esophagus, as well as to treat concomitant tracheoesophageal fistulae. The new EndoMAXX EVT is an esophageal stent with a reflux control valve, and is currently available for sale outside the United States. Merit Endotek's biliary stent systems are marketed under the Alimaxx B brand name. Alimaxx B stent systems are used by interventional gastroenterologists to palliate symptoms associated with malignant tumors affecting the bile duct. Additionally, we sell a plastic biliary stent that is used to restore patency and relieve symptoms associated with strictures and blockages within the biliary system. These stents are often used to stage treatment of malignant tumors such as pancreatic cancer and other serious conditions. Merit Endotek's esophageal balloon dilator, the Elation Fixed Wire Balloon Dilator, was introduced late in 2015, and is intended for use in adult and adolescent populations to endoscopically dilate strictures of the esophagus. In 2016, we added a wire guided balloon dilator, intended for use in the alimentary tract, to the Elation product line. These devices can be paired with Merit Endotek's BIG60 inflation device. Merit Endotek's BIG60 Inflation Device is a 60 mL device designed to inflate and deflate non vascular balloon dilators while monitoring and displaying inflation pressures up to 12 atmospheres. Merit Endotek also offers Endotek labeled versions of the BasixCOMPAK and Monarch Inflation Device to customers in pulmonology, gastroenterology, and thoracic surgery. For non vascular procedures, we market the MAXXWIRE guide wire, our line of specialty guide wires that have pulmonology and gastroenterology applications. For endoscopy and bronchoscopy procedures, we offer a variety of kits and accessories, including the AEROSIZER tracheobronchial stent sizing device, the Brighton Bipolar Probe, the BiliQUICK Cholangiography Rapid Refill Continuous 9 Table of Contents Injection Kit, the TIO 3 in 1 combination oral airway, bite block and oxygen administration device, the Vaclok Negative Pressure Syringe, and the convenient BAL (bronchoalveolar lavage) Convenience Kit . Specialty Procedure Products In addition to the procedures and devices detailed above, interventional radiology and other special procedure labs perform a variety of invasive diagnostic and interventional procedures. Our digital inflation devices, the IntelliSystem , Monarch and Blue Diamond are used in discography, a technique used to determine whether a disc is the source of pain in patients with back or neck pain. We provide coating services for medical tubes and wires under OEM brands. We offer coated tubes and wires to customers on a spool or as further manufactured comp1nts like hypotubes, guide wire comp1nts, coated mandrels stylets and coated needles. We operate a hypotube manufacturing facility in Galway, Ireland, which provides advanced laser cutting and ablation, passivation, cleaning and other hypotube manufacturing processes. Our Merit Hypotube TM is used as the catheter shaft in percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty and percutaneous transluminal angioplasty balloon catheters, as well as functional guide wires. Our sensor division manufactures and sells microelectromechanical systems sensor comp1nts consisting of piezoresistive pressure sensors in various forms, including bare silicon die, die mounted on ceramic substrates, and fully calibrated comp1nts for numerous applications both inside and outside the healthcare industry. 10 Table of Contents Marketing and Sales Target Market Industry. Our principal target markets are peripheral intervention, cardiac intervention, interventional oncology and endoscopy. Within these markets our products are used in the following clinical areas diagnostic and interventional cardiology; interventional radiology; neurointerventional radiology and surgery; vascular, general and thoracic surgery; electrophysiology; cardiac rhythm management; interventional pulmonology; interventional nephrology; orthopaedic spine surgery; interventional oncology and pain management; outpatient access centers; computed tomography; ultrasound; and interventional gastroenterology. According to U.S. government statistics, cardiovascular disease continues to be a leading cause of death and a significant health problem in the United States. Treatment options range from dietary changes to surgery, depending on the nature of the specific disease or disorder. Endovascular techniques, including angioplasty, stenting, and endoluminal stent grafts, continue to represent important therapeutic options for the treatment of vascular disease. We derive a large percentage of our revenues from sales of products used during percutaneous diagnostic and interventional procedures such as angiography, angioplasty, and stent placement, and we intend to pursue additional sales growth by building on our existing market position in both catheter technology and accessory products. In addition to products used in the treatment of coronary and peripheral vascular disease and in electrophysiology, we continue our efforts to develop and distribute other devices used in our target markets. For example, we have developed and are distributing products used for percutaneous drainage. Prior to the widespread use of computed tomography or ultrasound imaging, surgery was necessary to drain internal fluid from body cavities and organs. Currently, percutaneous drainage is frequently prescribed as the treatment of choice for many types of fluid collections. Our family of drainage catheters and associated devices are used by physicians in interventional radiology, vascular surgery and cardiology catheter lab procedures. Marketing Strategy. As part of our product sales and marketing efforts, we attend major medical conventions throughout the world pertaining to our target markets and invest in market development including physician training, peer to peer education, and patient outreach. We work closely with major centers involving our primary target markets in the areas of training, therapy awareness programs, clinical studies and ongoing research. We also offer products to service the dialysis access market. These products are used in renal replacement therapies, including the treatment of acute renal failure, chronic renal failure and end stage renal disease. Our hemodialysis access products include catheters and kits for interventional radiologists and interventional nephrologists. Our family of perit1al dialysis products is designed to support specific implantation techniques for interventional radiologists, interventional nephrologists and laparoscopic surgeons. We also offer a variety of products for dialysis access interventions for these customers. We believe the development of Merit Endotek and the move into the areas of interventional gastroenterology, pulmonology and thoracic surgery will open new opportunities to sell our existing products, such as inflation devices, syringes, centesis catheters and procedure kits to those markets, but will also provide additional products incorporating our non vascular stent and guide wire technology. In general, our target markets are characterized by rapid change resulting from technological advances and scientific discoveries. We plan to continue to develop and launch innovative products to support clinical trends and to address the increasing demands of these markets. Product Development Strategy . Our product development is focused on identifying and introducing a regular flow of profitable products that meet customer needs. In order to stay abreast of customer needs, we frequently seek suggestions from health care professionals working in multiple fields of medicine, including diagnostic and interventional cardiology; interventional radiology; neurointerventional radiology and surgery; vascular, general and thoracic surgery; electrophysiology; cardiac rhythm management; interventional pulmonology; interventional nephrology; orthopaedic spine surgery; interventional oncology and pain management; outpatient access centers; computed tomography; ultrasound; and interventional gastroenterology. Suggestions for new products and product improvements may also come from engineers, marketing, sales people, physicians and technicians who perform clinical procedures. When we believe that a product suggestion demonstrates a sustainable competitive advantage, meets customer needs, fits strategically and technologically with our business and has a good potential financial return, we generally assemble a project team comprised of individuals from our sales, marketing, engineering, manufacturing, legal, and quality assurance departments. This team works to identify the customer requirements, integrate the design, compile necessary documentation and testing, and prepare the product for market introduction. We believe that 1 of our marketing strengths is our capacity to conceive, design, develop and introduce new products. 11 Table of Contents U.S. and International Sales. Sales of our products in the U.S. accounted for approximately 61% of our net sales in each of the years ended December 31, 2016, 2015 and 2014. In the U.S., we have a dedicated, direct sales organization primarily focused on selling to end user physicians, hospitals and clinics, major buying groups and integrated healthcare ne2rks. Internationally, we employ sales representatives and contract with independent dealer organizations and custom procedure tray manufacturers to distribute our products worldwide, including territories in Europe, Africa, the Middle East, Asia, South and Central America, Oceania, and Canada. In 2016, our international sales grew approximately 9% over our 2015 international sales, and accounted for approximately 39% of our net sales. China represents our most significant international sales market with net sales of approximately $59.9 million , $50.7 million , and $40.7 million for the years ended December 31, 2016 , 2015 and 2014 , respectively. Merit Endotek has a growing domestic presence and a presence in international markets. With the recent and planned additions to our product lines, we believe our international sales will continue to increase. We have a global direct sales force of more than 280 employees located in the following geographic regions United States 128 employees; Europe, Middle East and Africa 78 employees; and Asia Pacific, Canada, Latin America 80 employees. Our largest non U.S. market is China, which represented approximately ten percent of our net sales in 2016. We maintain a distribution center and administrative office in Beijing. We also have small sales offices in Shanghai, Guangzhou, and Hong Kong. We sell our products through more than 400 distributors in mainland China, who are responsible for reselling the products, primarily to hospitals. We employ over 50 sales people throughout China who work with our distributors to promote the clinical advantages of our products to clinicians and other decision makers at hospitals. Under this modified direct sales approach, our salespeople are involved with promoting the advantages of our products to clinicians and other customers, while the distributors handle sales transactions and address issues related to fulfillment and inventory management. In Europe, the Middle East, and Africa, we have both corporate (i.e., direct) and modified corporate sales operations. Our corporate sales operations are based in 16 European countries, including the largest markets of the UK, France, Germany, and most recently Spain, where the Company transiti1d from a long standing distributor to a corporate sales structure near the end of 2016. Our direct sales personnel are principally engaged in our Cardiac Intervention, Peripheral Intervention and Interventional Oncology and Spine product groups. Each division operates clinical education programs, often directed by leading subject matter personnel, who provide technical instruction on techniques and therapies to physicians, nurses, and technologists. We are currently conducting education programs specific to radial access, spinal intervention, surgical grafts, and electrophysiology. We require our international dealers to inventory products and sell directly to customers within defined sales territories. Each of our products must be approved for sale under the laws of the country in which it is sold. International dealers are responsible for compliance with applicable anti bribery laws, such as the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, as well as all applicable laws and regulations in their respective countries. In 2016, we began conversions from distributor based sales models to direct sales models in Australia and Canada. We now supply hundreds of healthcare providers directly in Australia and Canada from Merit operated distribution centers in those countries. We also began negotiations in 2016 with our long time exclusive distribution partner in Japan to assume distribution responsibilities for most of our product lines in Japan. We expect this conversion to begin later this year. These distributor to direct sales conversions generally involve eliminating a distributor from the sales channel, either by acquiring the distributor or terminating the distribution relationship. Our goal with conversion is to obtain improved product pricing and more direct access to the end users of our products within these sales channels. We consider training to be a critical factor in the success of our sales force. Members of our sales force are trained by our clinical marketers, our staff professionals, consulting physicians, and senior field trainers in their respective territories. OEM Sales. Our global original equipment manufacturer ( OEM ) division sells comp1nts and finished devices, including molded comp1nts, sub assembled goods, custom kits, and bulk non sterile goods, to medical device manufacturers. These products may be combined with other comp1nts and products from other companies and sold under a Merit or third party label. Products sold by our OEM division can be customized and enhanced to customer specifications, including packaging, labeling and a variety of physical modifications. Our OEM division serves customers with a staff of regional sales representatives based in the U.S., Europe and Asia, and a dedicated OEM Engineering and Customer Service Group. 12 Table of Contents Customers We provide products to hospitals and clinic based cardiologists, radiologists, neurologists, nephrologists, vascular surgeons, orthopaedic surgeons, interventional gastroenterologists and pulmonologists, thoracic surgeons, physiatrists (pain management physicians), general surgeons, thoracic surgeons, oncologists, electrophysiologists, technicians, and nurses. Hospitals and acute care facilities in the United States generally purchase our products through our direct sales force, distributors, OEM partners, or custom procedure tray manufacturers who assemble and combine our products in custom kits and packs. Outside the United States, hospitals and acute care facilities generally purchase our products through our direct sales force, or, in the absence of a sales force, through independent distributors or OEM partners. In 2016, our U.S. sales force made sales accounting for approximately 45% of our net sales directly to U.S. hospitals and sales accounting for approximately six percent of our net sales through other channels, such as U.S. custom procedure tray manufacturers and distributors. We also sell products to other medical device companies through our U.S. OEM sales force, which accounted for approximately 10% of our 2016 net sales. The remaining 39% of our 2016 net sales was attributable to sales made to international markets by our direct sales force, international distributors, and our OEM sales force. Sales to our largest customer accounted for approximately 3 percent of net sales during the year ended December 31, 2016. Research and Development Our research and development operations have been central to our historical growth, and we believe they will be critical to our continued growth. In 2016, our commitment to innovation led to the introduction of several new products, enhancements to our existing products and expansion of our product lines, as well as improvements to our manufacturing processes and equipment. Our research and development expenses were approximately $45.2 million, $40.8 million, and $36.6 million in 2016, 2015 and 2014, respectively. We continue to develop new products and make improvements to our existing products utilizing many different sources. Our Chief Executive Officer and Executive Vice President of Global Research & Development, work closely with our sales and marketing teams to incorporate feedback from physicians and clinicians in the field, which can lead to innovative new products and improvements to our existing products. Currently we have research and development facilities in Dallas, Texas Galway, Ireland Jackson Township, New Jersey Malvern, Pennsylvania Paris, France Pearland, Texas San Jose, California South Jordan, Utah Venlo, The Netherlands Manufacturing We manufacture many of our products utilizing our proprietary technology and our expertise in plastic injection and insert molding. We generally contract with third parties for the tooling of our molds, but we design and own most of our molds. We utilize our experience in injection and insert molding technologies in the manufacture of most of the custom comp1nts used in our products. We have received International Standards Organization ( ISO ) 134852003 certification for our facilities in Utah, Texas, Virginia, Pennsylvania, The Netherlands, Ireland, France and Mexico. We have also received ISO 90012008 certification for our Merit Sensor Systems, Inc. ( Merit Sensors ) facility in South Jordan, Utah. Given the specialization of our manufacturing personnel and processes in our Utah and Ireland facilities, we possess the capability to strategically shift the manufacture of more technologically advanced products to those facilities, and utilize the manufacturing capacity of our other facilities for more commoditized products. The actual determination of manufacturing location will be based upon multiple factors, including technological capabilities, market demand, acquisition and integration activities and economic and competitive conditions. 13 Table of Contents Merit Sensors develops and markets silicon pressure sensors and presently supplies substantial portions of the sensors we utilize in our digital inflation devices and blood pressure transducers. We currently produce and package all of our embolic products. Manufacturing of our embolic products includes the synthesis and processing of raw materials and third party manufactured compounds. Our products are manufactured at several facilities, including facilities located in South Jordan and West Jordan, Utah; Malvern, Pennsylvania; Galway, Ireland; Venlo, The Netherlands; Paris, France; Pearland, Texas; Tijuana, Mexico; Joinville, Brazil; and Chester, Virginia. See Item 2 Properties. We have distribution centers located in South Jordan, Utah; Chester, Virginia; Malvern, Pennsylvania; Beijing and Hong Kong, China; Maastricht, The Netherlands; Melbourne, Australia; Ontario, Canada and Joinville, Brazil. We believe that our variety of suppliers for raw materials and comp1nts necessary for the manufacture of our products, as well as our long term relationships with such suppliers, promote stability in our manufacturing processes. Historically, we have not been materially affected by interruptions with such suppliers; however, we are experiencing a growing trend from suppliers of polymer resins to refuse to supply resin to medical device manufacturers or require that we assume additional risks due to the potential for product liability claims. There can be no assurance that we will not experience supply disruptions in the future. We seek to develop relationships with potential back up suppliers for materials and comp1nts in the event of supply interruptions. Competition The medical products industry is highly competitive. Many of our competitors are much larger than us and have access to greater resources. We also compete with smaller companies that sell single or limited numbers of products in specific product lines or geographies. We compete globally in several market areas, including diagnostic and interventional cardiology; interventional radiology; neurointerventional radiology and surgery; vascular, general and thoracic surgery; electrophysiology; cardiac rhythm management; interventional pulmonology; interventional nephrology; orthopaedic spine surgery; interventional oncology and pain management; outpatient access centers; computed tomography; ultrasound; and interventional gastroenterology. The principal competitive factors in the markets in which our products are sold are quality, price, value, device features, customer service, breadth of line, and customer relationships. We believe our products have achieved market acceptance primarily due to the quality of materials and workmanship of our products, clinical outcomes, their innovative design, our willingness to customize our products to fit customer needs, and our prompt attention to customer requests. Our products are priced competitively, but generally not below prices for competing products. Some of our primary competitive strengths are our relative stability in the marketplace; a comprehensive, broad line of ancillary products; and our history of introducing a variety of new products and product line extensions to the market on a regular basis. In the interventional cardiology and radiology markets, as well as the gastroenterology, general surgery, thoracic surgery and pulmonology markets, we compete with large international, multi divisional medical supply companies such as Cordis Corporation (Cardinal Health), Boston Scientific Corporation, Medtronic, C.R. Bard, Abbott Teleflex, Cook Incorporated, and Terumo Corporation. Medium size companies we compete with include Vascular Solutions, B. Braun, Olympus Medical, Edwards Lifesciences, Argon Medical Devices, CONMED, AngioDynamics, Medcomp, and ICU Medical. Based on available industry data, with respect to the number of procedures performed, we believe we are a leading provider of digital inflation technology in the world. In addition, we believe we are 1 of the market leaders in the United States for analog inflation devices. We believe we are a market leader in the United States for control syringes, waste disposal systems, tubing and manifolds. We anticipate the recent and planned additions to our product lines will help us compete even more effectively in both the U.S. and international markets. There is no assurance that we will be able to maintain our existing competitive advantages or compete successfully in the future. We derive a substantial majority of our revenues from sales of products used in diagnostic angiography, interventional cardiology and radiology procedures. We believe medical professionals are starting to use new interventional methods, procedures and devices, as well as drugs, for the treatment and prevention of cardiovascular disease. These new methods, procedures, devices and drugs may render some of our products obsolete or limit the markets for our products. However, with the advent of vascular stents and other procedures, we have experienced continued growth in sales of our products. 14 Table of Contents In the vertebral augmentation market, our main competitors are Medtronic and Stryker. In April 2016, Stryker acquired CareFusion, which had been a key competitor in this space. Both Medtronic and Stryker offer products to treat vertebral compression fractures, but only Medtronic offers products to treat metastatic spine tumors. Within the field of uterine fibroid embolization, or UFE, we believe we are a market share leader. Based on both research and clinical studies conducted on our product for UFE, we believe we offer physicians consistent and predictable product performance, ease of use, targeted delivery, and durable vessel occlusion, and therefore satisfactory short and long term clinical outcomes validated by peer reviewed publications, when compared to our competitors. Our primary competitive embolotherapy product has been Embosphere Microspheres. Currently, the primary products with which our microspheres and embolic particles compete are Beadblock and DC Bead , sold by BTG plc; Embozene and Contour sold by Boston Scientific, Inc; PVA Foam Embolization Particles, sold by Cook Medical; HydroPearl , sold by Terumo International Systems ("Terumo"); and Gelfoam , sold by Pfizer Inc. Our principal competitors in UFE are BTG plc, Boston Scientific and Terumo, as well as companies selling or developing non embolotherapy solutions to treat uterine fibroids. Proprietary Rights and Litigation We rely on a combination of patents, trade secrets, trademarks, copyrights and confidentiality agreements to protect our intellectual property. We have a number of U.S. and foreign issued patents and pending patent applications, including patents and rights to patent applications acquired through strategic transactions, which relate to various aspects of our products and technology. The duration of our patents is determined by the laws of the country of issuance and for the U.S. is typically 20 years from the date of filing of the patent. As of December 31, 2016, we owned or had a license to more than 800 U.S. and international patents and patent applications. Additionally, we hold exclusive and non exclusive licenses to a variety of third party technologies covered by patents and patent applications. In the aggregate, our intellectual property assets are critical to our business, but no single patent, trademark or other intellectual property asset is of material importance to our business. The Merit name and logo are trademarks in the U.S. and other countries. In addition to the Merit name and logo, we have used, registered or applied for registration of other specific trademarks and service marks to help distinguish our products, technologies, and services from those of our competitors in the U.S. and foreign countries. See Products above. The duration of our trademark registrations varies from country to country; in the U.S. we generally are able to maintain our trademark rights and renew any trademark registrations for as long as the trademarks are in use. As of December 31, 2016, we owned over 250 U.S. and foreign trademark registrations and trademark applications. There is substantial litigation regarding patents and other intellectual property rights in the medical device industry. At any given time, we may be involved as either, or both, a plaintiff and a defendant in patent infringement actions. If a court rules against us in any patent litigation we could be subject to significant liabilities, be forced to seek licenses from third parties, or be prevented from marketing certain products. In addition, intellectual property litigation is costly and may consume significant time of employees and management. Regulation U.S. Regulation. The Food and Drug Administration ( FDA ) and other federal, state and local authorities regulate our products and product related activities. Under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act ( FDCA ) and accompanying regulations, the FDA regulates the design, development, clinical trials, testing, manufacture, packaging, labeling, storage, distribution and promotion of medical devices. We believe our products and procedures are in material compliance with all applicable FDA regulations, but the regulations are subject to change. We cannot predict the effect, if any, that these changes might have on our business. In addition, if we experience regulatory problems with a product or manufacturer, we could become subject to fines, delays or suspensions of regulatory clearances, seizures or recalls of products, operating restrictions, and criminal prosecution. Such actions could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition or results of operations. In October 2016, we received a subpoena from the U.S. Department of Justice seeking information on certain of our marketing and promotional practices. We are in the process of responding to the subpoena, which we anticipate will continue during 2017. The investigation is ongoing and at this time we are unable to predict its scope, duration or outcome. Investigations such as this may result in the imposition of, among other things, significant damages, injunctions, fines or civil or criminal claims or penalties against our company or individuals. 15 Table of Contents Overview of FDA Regulation of Devices. The FDCA establishes a risk based classification system for medical devices and applies regulatory controls commensurate with the risk posed by a device Class I devices are those for which safety and effectiveness can be reasonably assured by adherence to the FDA general regulatory controls, which include compliance with the applicable portions of the FDA Quality System Regulations (QSRs), facility registration and product listing, reporting of certain adverse medical events and malfunctions, and compliance with FDA restrictions against misbranding and adulteration. While most Class I devices are exempt from the 510(k) premarket notification process, some Class I devices also require 510(k) clearance by the FDA. Class II devices are subject to the FDA general controls, including the design control requirements of the QSRs, and any other special controls deemed necessary by the FDA to provide reasonable assurance of the safety and effectiveness of the device. Premarket review and clearance by the FDA for Class II devices are accomplished through the 510(k) premarket notification procedure. Class III devices are those deemed by the FDA to pose the greatest risk, such as life sustaining, life supporting or implantable devices, or those devices deemed not substantially equivalent to a legally marketed predicate device. Class III devices include those devices for which FDA has determined that general and special controls al1 are insufficient to assure the safety and effectiveness of the device. FDA Premarket Review. In general, we cannot introduce a new medical device into the market until we obtain market clearance through a 510(k) premarket notification or approval through a premarket approval ( PMA ) application. Some devices, typically lower risk devices, are subject to specific exemptions from premarket review. In addition, in limited cases devices may come to the market through alternative procedures, such as a de novo classification request or humanitarian device exemption. To obtain 510(k) clearance, a device manufacturer must submit a premarket notification to the FDA demonstrating that the device is substantially equivalent to another legally marketed predicate device. A predicate device is a device that has been cleared through the 510(k) process; a device that was legally marketed prior to May 28, 1976; a device that has been downclassified by the FDA to Class I or Class II; or a device that FDA has previously determined to be exempt from the 510(k) process. To be substantially equivalent, the notification must show that the new device has the same intended use and the same technology as the predicate device, or, if the new device has different technology, that the device is as safe and effective as the predicate device and does not raise different questions of safety and effectiveness. Performance testing is generally required to demonstrate substantial equivalence, and, for some devices, clinical data may be required. The standards and data requirements necessary for the clearance of a new device may be unclear or may be subject to change. In addition, FDA may publish or adopt special controls it deems necessary to provide a reasonable assurance of the safety and effectiveness of a device, which might include standards for the testing and clearance of a new device. The 510(k) clearance procedure usually takes between 3 months and 1 year from the date a 510(k) notification is submitted, but it may take longer. The FDA may find that substantial equivalence has not been shown and, as a result, require additional clinical or non clinical testing to support a 510(k) or require the submission of a de novo classification request or PMA application for the device. A de novo classification is an alternate pathway to classify novel devices that are low to moderate risk but for which no substantially equivalent predicate device exists. Clearance of a de novo request generally takes six months to 1 year from the time of submission of the de novo request, although it can take longer. A PMA application is required for Class III devices. The application must demonstrate that there is reasonable assurance that the device is safe and effective for its intended use based on valid scientific evidence. The PMA application process can be expensive, generally takes several years to complete and typically includes, among other things, human clinical trials, manufacturing facility inspection, bench tests, and laboratory and animal studies, which can be costly to conduct. There is also a substantial user fee that must be paid to FDA in connection with the submission of each PMA application. The FDA may determine that additional information, including clinical data, be submitted before a determination is made, which could significantly delay the introduction of new devices. If the FDA approves the PMA application, it may place restrictions on the device. If the FDA's evaluation of the PMA application is not favorable, the FDA may deny approval of the PMA application or issue a not approvable letter. The FDA may also require additional testing or clinical trials prior to approval or as a condition of approval. If human clinical trials of a medical device are required for FDA clearance or approval and the device presents a significant risk, the sponsor of the trial must file an investigational device exemption ( IDE ) application with the FDA prior to commencing human clinical trials in the USA. Submission of an IDE application does not ensure that the FDA will issue the IDE. If the IDE application is approved, there can be no assurance the FDA will determine that the data derived from the trials support the safety and effectiveness of the device or warrant the continuation of clinical trials. An IDE supplement must be approved by the FDA before a sponsor or investigator may make a change to the investigational plan in such a way that may affect its scientific soundness, 16 Table of Contents study indication or the rights, safety or welfare of human subjects. For clinical trials involving a device that does not present a significant risk, the sponsor is not required to obtain approval of an IDE, but the sponsor must obtain the review and approval of an institutional review board. Both significant risk and non significant risk trials are subject to additional FDA regulations, including a requirement to obtain informed consent and reporting and recordkeeping requirements. We, the FDA, or the institutional review board, may suspend a clinical trial at any time for various reasons, including a belief that the risks to study subjects outweigh the anticipated benefits. The FDA clearance and approval processes for medical devices are expensive, uncertain and lengthy. There can be no assurance that we will be able to obtain necessary regulatory clearances or approvals for any product on a timely basis or at all. Delays in receipt of or failure to receive such clearances or approvals, the loss of previously received clearances or approvals, or the failure to comply with existing or future regulatory requirements could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition or results of operations. In addition, if the FDA discovers that an applicant has submitted false or misleading information, the FDA may refuse to review submissions until certain requirements are met pursuant to its Application Integrity Policy, which specifies procedures that FDA personnel should follow to ensure the integrity of data and information in applications submitted for FDA review and approval. We are currently conducting a clinical trial to obtain PMA approval from the FDA to claim the use of the QuadraSphere Microspheres with doxorubicin for the treatment of liver cancer in the United States. We are also conducting clinical trials to obtain FDA PMA approval to claim the use of our Embosphere Microspheres for the indication of prostate artery embolization, and 510(k) clearance for the use of our EndoMAXX EVT Valved Esophageal Stent to relieve dysphagia in patients with malignant stricture of the esophagus. In order for us to obtain FDA approval or clearance to promote the use of QuadraSphere Microspheres, Embosphere Microspheres, and the EndoMAXX EVT Valved Esophageal Stent for the purposes indicated in our clinical trials, we will need to complete those trials and submit positive clinical data to the FDA. If we cannot enroll study subjects in sufficient numbers to complete the necessary studies, if there is a disruption in the supply of materials for the trials or depending on other factors, we will likely not be able to complete those trials. Even if we complete any or all of the 3 clinical trials, the FDA may require us to undertake additional testing, or the trial results may not be sufficient to obtain FDA approval or clearance for other reasons, including inconclusive or negative results of our trials or those conducted by our competitors or other third parties. If we do not obtain FDA approval or clearance of the product use claimed in a clinical trial, we will not be able to promote the subject product for the indicated treatment of the specific disease or condition in the United States. Changes in Cleared or Approved Devices. Certain modifications to our marketed devices, including certain manufacturing changes, product enhancements and product line extensions, require new 510(k) clearance or approval of a PMA supplement. For devices marketed under an approved PMA, we must submit a PMA supplement to FDA for review and approval prior to making a change to the device that affects the safety or effectiveness of the device, including changes to the design, manufacturing or labeling of the device. Likewise, for 510(k) cleared devices, we must obtain new FDA 510(k) clearance when there is a major change or modification in the intended use or indications for use or a change or modification of the device that could significantly affect the safety or effectiveness of the device. In some cases, clinical data may be required to support a PMA supplement or 510(k) premarket notification for a device modification. The FDA may determine that a modified device is not substantially equivalent to the marketed device or may require that additional information, including clinical data, be submitted before a determination is made, either of which could significantly delay the introduction of modified devices. Quality System Requirements. The FDCA requires us to comply with the Quality System Regulation ( QSR ) and various foreign regulations require compliance with ISO 13485 or national law requirements pertaining to all aspects of our product design and manufacturing processes, including requirements for packaging, labeling, record keeping, personnel training, supplier qualification, design controls, complaint handling, corrective and preventive actions and internal auditing. The FDA and foreign regulators enforce these requirements through periodic inspections of medical device manufacturers. These requirements are complex, technical and require substantial resources to remain compliant. Our failure or the failure of our suppliers to maintain compliance with these requirements could result in the shutdown of our manufacturing operations or the recall of our products, which would have a material adverse effect on our business. If 1 of our suppliers fails to maintain compliance with our quality requirements, we may have to qualify a new supplier and could experience manufacturing delays as a result. We also could be subject to injunctions, product seizures, or civil or criminal penalties. Labeling and Promotion . Our labeling and promotional activities are also subject to scrutiny by the FDA and foreign regulators. Labeling includes not only the label on a device, but also includes any descriptive or informational literature that accompanies or is used to promote the device. Among other things, labeling violates the law if it is false or misleading in any respect or it fails to contain adequate directions for use. Moreover, product claims that are outside the approved or cleared labeling violate the FDCA and other applicable regulations. If the FDA determines that our promotional materials constitute promotion of an uncleared or unapproved use, or otherwise violate the FDCA, it could request that we modify our promotional materials or subject us to regulatory or enforcement actions, including the issuance of an untitled letter, a notice of violation, a warning letter, 17 Table of Contents injunction, seizure, civil fines or criminal penalties. Allegations of off label promotion can also result in enforcement action by federal, state, or foreign enforcement authorities and trigger significant civil or criminal penalties, including exclusion from the Medicare and Medicaid programs and liability under the False Claims Act, discussed further below. Our product promotion is also subject to regulation by the Federal Trade Commission (the FTC ), which has primary oversight of the advertising of unrestricted devices. The Federal Trade Commission Act prohibits unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices in or affecting commerce, as well as unfair or deceptive practices such as the dissemination of any false or misleading advertisement pertaining to medical devices. FTC enforcement can result in orders requiring, among other things, limits on advertising, corrective advertising, consumer redress, rescission of contracts and such other relief as the FTC may deem necessary. In addition, under the federal Lanham Act and similar state laws, competitors and others can initiate litigation relating to advertising claims. Import Requirements. To import a medical device into the United States, the importer must file an entry notice and bond with the United States Bureau of Customs and Border Protection ( CBP ). All devices are subject to FDA examination before release from the CBP. Any article that appears to be in violation of the FDCA may be refused admission and a notice of detention and hearing may be issued. If the FDA ultimately refuses admission, the CBP may issue a notice for redelivery and assess liquidated damages for up to 3 times the value of the lot. Additionally, the laws of the United States require imported articles to have their labels accurately marked with the appropriate country of origin, the violation of which may result in confiscation, fines and penalties. Export Requirements. Products for export from Europe or the United States are subject to foreign countries' import requirements and the exporting requirements of the FDA or European regulating bodies, as applicable. In particular, international sales of medical devices manufactured in the United States that are not approved or cleared by the FDA for use in the United States, or are banned or deviate from lawful performance standards, are subject to FDA export requirements and we may not be able to export such products. Foreign countries often require, among other things, an FDA certificate for products for export, also called a Certificate to Foreign Government. To obtain this certificate from the FDA, the device manufacturer must apply to the FDA. The FDA certifies that the product has been granted clearance or approval in the United States and that the manufacturing facilities were in compliance with the QSR at the time of the last FDA inspection. Additionally, the export of our products to certain countries is subject to restrictions due to trade and economic sanctions imposed by the United States, the European Union and other governments and organizations. The U.S. Departments of Justice, Commerce, State and Treasury and other federal agencies and authorities have a broad range of civil and criminal penalties they may seek to impose against corporations and individuals for violations of economic sanctions laws, export control laws, and other federal statutes and regulations, including those established by the Office of Foreign Assets Control ( OFAC ). Under these laws and regulations, as well as other export control laws, customs laws, sanctions laws and other laws governing our operations, various government agencies may require export licenses and may seek to impose modifications to business practices, including cessation of business activities in sancti1d countries or with sancti1d persons or entities. Additional Postmarket Requirements . Medical device manufacturers are also subject to other postmarket requirements, including product listing and establishment regulations, compliance with FDA requirements for unique device identifiers, reports of corrections and removals and other requirements. Medical Device Reporting ( MDR ) requirements of the FDA, vigilance reporting requirements under the European Medical Devices Directive and similar regulations in other foreign markets, require manufacturers to report to the FDA or an equivalent foreign regulatory body any incident in which their device may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury, or has malfuncti1d in a way that would likely cause or contribute to a death or serious injury if the malfunction of the device or a similar device were to recur. Our obligation to report under the MDR regulations is triggered on the date on which we become aware of an adverse event and the nature of the event. If we fail to comply with our MDR reporting obligations, the FDA could issue warning letters or untitled letters, take administrative actions, commence criminal prosecution, impose civil m1tary penalties, revoke our device clearances, seize our products, or delay the clearance of our future products. The FDA regularly inspects companies to determine compliance with the QSRs and other postmarket requirements. Failure to comply with statutory requirements and the FDA regulations can result in an FDA Form 483 (which is issued by the FDA at the conclusion of an inspection when an investigator has observed any conditions that may constitute violations), public warning letters, m1tary penalties against a company or its officers and employees, suspension or withdrawal of regulatory 18 Table of Contents approvals, operating restrictions, total or partial suspension of production, injunctions, product recalls, product detentions, refusal to provide export certificates, seizure of products and criminal prosecution. Foreign Regulations. Medical device laws and regulations are also in effect in many countries outside of the United States. These laws and regulations vary significantly from country to country and range from comprehensive device approval requirements for some or all of our medical device products to more basic requests for product data or certification. The number, scope, complexity, and cost of these requirements are increasing. Foreign regulatory approval processes for medical devices are expensive, uncertain and lengthy. There can be no assurance that we will be able to obtain necessary regulatory approvals for any product on a timely basis or at all. Delays in receipt of or failure to receive such approvals, the loss of previously received approvals, or the failure to comply with existing or future regulatory requirements could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition or results of operations. Additionally, the European Commission is currently revising the legal framework for medical devices in the European Economic Area ("EEA"). Adoption of the new regulations is anticipated in 2017 and is expected to include a 3 year transition period. The new regulations are not expected to change fundamentally the regulatory framework for medical devices in the EEA. However, among other things, the new regulations are likely to include stricter clinical evidence requirements, impose additional reporting obligations on manufacturers of high risk devices, and require manufacturers to appoint an individual with responsibility for regulatory compliance. If the current EEA and other foreign regulations regarding the manufacture and sale of medical devices change, the new regulations may impose additional obligations on medical device manufactures or otherwise have a material adverse effect on our business. Reimbursement. Our products are generally used in medical procedures that are covered and reimbursed by governmental payers, such as Medicare, and or private health plans. In general, these third party payers cover a medical device and or related procedure only when the payer determines that healthcare outcomes are supported by medical evidence and the device or procedure is medically necessary for the diagnosis or treatment of the patient illness or injury. Even if a device has received clearance or approval for marketing by the FDA, there is no certainty that third party payers will cover and reimburse for the cost of the device and related procedures. Because of increasing cost containment pressures, some private payers in the U.S. and government payers in foreign countries may also condition payment on the cost effectiveness of the device or procedure. Even if coverage is available, third party payers may place restrictions on the circumstances in which they provide coverage or may offer reimbursement that is not sufficient to cover the cost of our products. If healthcare providers such as hospitals and physicians cannot obtain adequate coverage and reimbursement for our products or the procedures in which they are used, this may affect demand for our products and our business, financial condition, results of operations, or cash flows could suffer a material adverse impact. Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act. The Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act ( PPACA ) has changed the way healthcare in the United States is financed by both governmental and private insurers and has significantly affected the medical device industry. This law contains a number of provisions, including provisions governing enrollment in federal healthcare programs, reimbursement changes, the increased funding of comparative effectiveness research for use in healthcare decision making, and enhancements to fraud and abuse requirements and enforcement, that we believe affect existing government healthcare programs and result in the development of new programs. The PPACA imposed on medical device manufacturers a 23% excise tax on U.S. sales of certain medical devices, which adversely affected our gross profit and earnings for our marketed products in 2015. At the end of 2015, the excise tax was suspended for the 2016 and 2017 tax years. The tax will automatically be reinstated beginning on January 1, 2018 absent further legislation action to extend the suspension or repeal the tax. We cannot predict whether any such action will be taken and whether the suspension will continue past 2017. Judicial challenges to, as well as legislative and executive initiatives to modify, limit, or repeal, the PPACA have been initiated and continue. For instance, in January 2017, President Trump issued an executive order which, among other things, stated that 1 of the priorities of the current administration is to seek prompt repeal of the PPACA and instructed all executive departments and branches to exercise their authority and discretion to minimize the economic and regulatory burdens of the PPACA to the maximum extent permitted by law. In light of such challenges to, and efforts to repeal or modify, the PPACA, we cannot predict what healthcare programs and regulations will be implemented or changed at the federal or state level in the United States, or the effect that any future legislation or regulation may have on our operations. The U.S. Physician Payment Sunshine Act, and similar state laws, also include annual reporting and disclosure requirements for device manufacturers aimed at increasing the transparency of the interactions between device manufacturers and healthcare providers. Reports submitted under these new requirements are placed in a public database. Other jurisdictions outside the United States have also begun adopting similar physician transparency laws. In addition to the burden of establishing processes for compliance, if we fail to provide these reports, or if the reports we provide are not accurate, we could be subject to significant penalties. 19 Table of Contents Anti Corruption Laws. Anti bribery and anti corruption laws are in place in the United States and in many jurisdictions throughout the world. In the United States, the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act (the "FCPA") prohibits corruptly offering, paying, or promising to pay anything of value to foreign officials for the purpose of obtaining or maintaining business. The FCPA also requires that we maintain fair and accurate books and records and devise and maintain an adequate system of internal accounting controls. Among other requirements to implement compliance, we are required to train our U.S. and international employees, and to train and monitor foreign third parties with whom we contract, e.g., distributors, to ensure compliance with these anti corruption laws. Failing to comply with the FCPA or any other anti corruption law could result in fines, penalties or other adverse consequences. Anti Kickback Statutes. The federal healthcare Anti Kickback Statute prohibits persons from, among other things, knowingly and willfully offering or paying remuneration, directly or indirectly, to a person to induce the purchase, order, lease, or recommendation of a good or service for which payment may be made in whole or part under a federal healthcare program such as Medicare or Medicaid, unless the arrangement fits within 1 of several statutory exemptions or regulatory safe harbors. The definition of remuneration has been broadly interpreted to include anything of value, including, for example, gifts, discounts, the furnishing of supplies or equipment, credit arrangements, payments of cash and waivers of payments. Violations can result in significant penalties, imprisonment and exclusion from Medicare, Medicaid and other federal healthcare programs. Exclusion of a manufacturer would preclude any federal healthcare program from paying for the manufacturer products. In addition, kickback arrangements can provide the basis for an action under the False Claims Act, which is discussed in more detail below. A party failure to fully satisfy a regulatory safe harbor provision may result in increased scrutiny by government enforcement authorities. Government officials have recently increased enforcement efforts on the sales and marketing activities of pharmaceutical, medical device, and other healthcare companies, and recently have brought cases against individuals or entities that allegedly offered unlawful inducements to potential or existing customers to procure their business. Settlements of these government cases have involved significant fines and penalties and in some instances criminal pleas. In addition to the Anti Kickback Statute, many states have their own anti kickback laws. Often, these laws closely follow the language of the federal law, although they do not always have the same exceptions or safe harbors. In some states, these anti kickback laws apply with respect to all payers, including commercial health insurance companies. False Claims Laws. The False Claims Act prohibits any person from knowingly presenting, or causing to be presented, a false claim for payment to the federal government or knowingly making, or causing to be made, a false statement to get a false claim paid. Manufacturers can be held liable under false claims laws, even if they do not submit claims to the government, if they are found to have caused submission of false claims. Under the PPACA, a violation of the Anti Kickback Statute is deemed to be a violation of the False Claims Act. The False Claims Act also includes whistleblower provisions that allow private citizens to bring suit against an entity or individual on behalf of the United States and to recover a portion of any m1tary recovery. Many of the recent, highly publicized settlements in the healthcare industry relating to sales and marketing practices have been cases brought under the False Claims Act. Most states also have adopted statutes or regulations similar to the federal laws, which apply to Item and services reimbursed under Medicaid and other state programs. Sanctions under the Federal Claims Act and state laws may include civil m1tary penalties, exclusion of a manufacturer's products from reimbursement under government programs, criminal fines and imprisonment. Privacy and Security. The Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 ( HIPAA ), the Health Information Technology for Economic and Clinical Health Act (the HITECH Act ), and accompanying rules, require certain entities, referred to as "covered entities" (including most healthcare providers and health plans), to comply with established standards, including standards regarding the privacy and security of protected health information ( PHI ). HIPAA further requires that covered entities enter into agreements meeting certain regulatory requirements with their Business Associates, as such term is defined by HIPAA, which, among other things, obligate the Business Associates to safeguard the covered entity's PHI against improper use and disclosure. In addition, a Business Associate may face significant statutory and contractual liability if the Business Associate breaches the agreement or causes the covered entity to fail to comply with HIPAA. Additionally, many state laws regulate the use and disclosure of health information and require notification in the event of breach of such information. Although we do not believe we are a covered entity under HIPAA and do not meet the definition of Business Associate, we are committed to maintaining the security and privacy of patients health information and believe that we meet the expectations of the HIPAA rules in all material respects. However, to the extent we become subject to HIPAA, whether through a change in our business model or an enforcement action brought by the U.S. government, we would be directly subject to a broader range of requirements under HIPAA, HITECH, the rules issued thereunder and their respective civil and criminal penalties. Environmental, Health and Safety Regulations. We are subject to various federal, state, local and foreign laws and regulations relating to the protection of the environment, as well as public and employee health and safety. In the course of our 20 Table of Contents business, we are involved in the handling, storage and disposal of certain chemicals. The laws and regulations applicable to our operations include provisions that regulate the release or discharge of hazardous or other regulated materials into the environment. These environmental laws and regulations may impose strict liability, rendering a person liable without regard to negligence or fault on the part of such person. Such environmental laws and regulations may expose us to liability for the conduct of, or conditions caused by, others, or for acts that were in non compliance with all applicable laws at the time the acts were performed. Failure to comply with applicable environmental laws could have a material adverse effect on our business. Our operations are also subject to various laws and regulations relating to occupational health and safety. We maintain safety, training and maintenance programs as part of our ongoing efforts to ensure compliance with applicable laws and regulations. Compliance with applicable health and safety laws and regulations has required and continues to require expenditures. Environmental, health and safety legislation and regulations change frequently. Changes in those regulations could have a material adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. Seasonality Our worldwide sales have not historically reflected a significant degree of seasonality; however, customer purchases have historically been lower during the third quarter of the year, as compared to other quarters. This reflects, among other factors, lower demand during summer months in countries in the northern hemisphere. Employees As of December 31, 2016, we employed 4,150 people. N1 of our U.S. employees are subject to collective bargaining agreements; however, certain of our European employees are subject to such agreements. We believe our employee relations are generally good. Although our European employees will likely continue to be subject to collective organizing and bargaining activities, we do not expect such activities to materially affect our future operations. Recent Developments On January 31, 2017, we acquired substantially all the assets, including intellectual property covered by approximately 40 patents and pending applications, and assumed certain liabilities, of Catheter Connections, Inc. ( Catheter Connections ), in exchange for a payment for $38 million. Catheter Connections, which is based in Salt Lake City, Utah, developed and marketed the DualCap System, an innovative family of disinfecting products designed to protect patients from intravenous infections resulting from infusion therapy. On January 31, 2017, we completed the acquisition of the critical care division of Argon Medical Devices, Inc. ( Argon ). As part of the acquisition, we acquired several Argon subsidiaries located in Singapore, Japan and Europe, a manufacturing facility in Singapore, as well as approximately 100 registered trademarks and other intellectual property, and inventory located in the United States. The products within the acquired critical care division include pressure monitoring transducers and various catheters. The transaction consideration was valued at approximately $10 million. Because the acquisitions of the Catheter Connections assets and the critical care division of Argon were completed in 2017, the financial condition and results of operations presented herein are those of Merit and its subsidiaries prior to the completion of these acquisitions, and do not include the financial condition or results of operations of Catheter Connections or the critical care division of Argon. Available Information We file annual, quarterly and current reports and other information with the SEC. These materials can be inspected and copied at the SEC Public Reference Room at 100 F Street, NE, Washington, D.C. 20549. Copies of these materials may also be obtained by mail at prescribed rates from the SEC Public Reference Room at the above address. Information about the Public Reference Room can be obtained by calling the SEC at 1 800 SEC 0330. The SEC also maintains an Internet site that contains reports, proxy and information statements, and other information regarding issuers that file electronically with the SEC. The address of the SEC Internet website is www.sec.gov. We make available, free of charge, on our Internet website, located at www.merit.com, our most recent Annual Report on Form 10 K, our most recent Quarterly Reports on Form 10 Q, any Current Reports on Form 8 K filed since our most recent 21 Table of Contents Annual Report on Form 10 K, and any amendments to such reports as soon as reasonably practicable following the electronic filing of such report with the SEC. In addition, we provide electronic or paper copies of such filings free of charge upon request. Financial Information About Foreign and Domestic Sales For financial information relating to our foreign and domestic sales see Note 12 to our consolidated financial statements set forth in Item 8 of this report. 22 Table of Contents Item 1A. Risk Factors. Our business, operations and financial condition are subject to certain risks and uncertainties. Should 1 or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should any underlying assumptions prove incorrect, our actual results will vary, and may vary materially, from those anticipated, estimated, projected or expected. Among the key factors that may have a direct bearing on our business, operations or financial condition are the factors identified below We may be unable to successfully manage growth, particularly if accomplished through acquisitions, and the integration of acquired businesses may present significant challenges that could harm our operations. Successful implementation of our business strategy will require that we effectively manage any associated growth. To manage growth effectively, our management will need to continue to implement changes in certain aspects of our business, to improve our information systems, infrastructure and operations to respond to increased demand, to attract and retain qualified personnel, and to develop, train, and manage an increasing number of management level and other employees. Growth could place an increasing strain on our management, financial, product design, marketing, distribution and other resources, and we could experience operating difficulties. Any failure to manage growth effectively could have a material adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. Over the past several years, we completed a series of significant acquisitions, including our acquisition of DFINE, Inc. in 2016. As we grow through acquisitions, we face the additional challenges of integrating the operations, culture, information management systems and other characteristics of the acquired entity with our own. For instance, prior to its acquisition, DFINE was not profitable or cash flow positive and, as such, we have sought to make DFINE operations accretive to our results of operations by, among other things, substantially reducing the number of employees at DFINE, restructuring our sales and marketing operations, and consolidating a significant portion of the manufacturing activities related to the DFINE products. These and other efforts to integrate DFINE, as well as efforts to integrate future acquisitions, may be hampered by delays, the loss of certain employees, suppliers or customers, proceedings resulting from employment terminations, culture clashes, unbudgeted costs, and other issues at certain levels, which may occur at levels that are more severe or prolonged than anticipated. We have incurred, and will likely continue to incur, significant expenses in connection with negotiating and consummating various acquisition transactions, and we may inherit significant liabilities in connection with prospective acquisitions, including regulatory, infringement, product liability, discrimination or other legal claims or issues . In addition, we may not realize competitive advantages, synergies or other benefits anticipated in connection with any such acquisition. If we do not adequately identify targets for, or manage issues related to, our future acquisitions, such acquisitions may have an adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. We may not be able to effectively protect our intellectual property, which could harm our business and financial condition. Our ability to remain competitive is dependent, in part, upon our ability to protect our intellectual property rights and prevent other companies from using our intellectual property. We seek to protect our intellectual property rights through a combination of confidentiality and license agreements, and through copyright, patent, trademark, and trade secrets laws. However, all these measures afford only limited protection and may be challenged, invalidated, or circumvented by third parties. Additionally, these measures may not prevent competitors from duplicating our products or gaining access to our proprietary information and technology. Third parties may copy all or portions of our products or otherwise use our intellectual property without authorization, and we may not be able to prevent the unauthorized disclosure or use of our technical knowledge or trade secrets by consultants, vendors, former employees and current employees, despite the existence of nondisclosure and confidentiality agreements and other contractual restrictions, all of which could have an adverse effect on our business, operations, or financial condition. Third parties may also develop similar or superior technology independently or by designing around our patents. In addition, the laws of some foreign countries do not offer the same level of protection for our intellectual property as the laws of the U.S. Further, no assurances can be given that any patent application we have filed or will file will result in a patent being issued, or that any existing or future patents will afford adequate or meaningful protection against competitors or against similar technologies. All of our patents will eventually expire and some of our patents, including patents protecting significant elements of our technology, will expire within the next several years. Filing, prosecuting and defending our intellectual property in all countries throughout the world may be prohibitively expensive. Litigation may be necessary in the future to enforce our intellectual property rights, protect our trade secrets or to determine the validity and scope of proprietary rights claimed by others. Any such lawsuits that we might initiate could be expensive, take significant time and divert management's attention from our business. Litigation also puts our patents at risk of being invalidated or interpreted narrowly. Additionally, we may provoke third parties to assert claims against us. Moreover, the legal systems of certain countries, particularly certain developing countries, do not favor the aggressive enforcement of patent and other intellectual 23 Table of Contents property protection which makes it difficult to stop infringement. We may not prevail in any lawsuits that we initiate and the damages or other remedies awarded, if any, may not be commercially valuable. Third parties claiming that we infringe their intellectual property rights could cause us to incur significant legal or licensing expenses and prevent us from selling our products. Our commercial success will depend in part on not infringing or violating the intellectual property rights of others. From time to time, third parties may claim that we have infringed their intellectual property rights, including claims regarding patents, copyrights, trademarks, and trade secrets. We may not be aware of whether our products do or will infringe existing or future patents or the intellectual property rights of others. Because of constant technological change in the medical device industry in which we compete, the extensive patent coverage of existing technologies, and the rapid rate of issuance of new patents, it is possible that the number of these claims may grow. In addition, former employers of our former, current, or future employees may assert claims that such employees have improperly disclosed to us the confidential or proprietary information of these former employers. Any such claim, with or without merit, could result in costly litigation, distract management from day to day operations and harm our brand or reputation, which in turn could harm our business or results of operations. If we are not successful in defending such claims, we could be required to stop selling, delay shipments of, or redesign, our products, discontinue the use of related trademarks, technologies or designs, pay m1tary amounts as damages, enter into royalty or licensing arrangements or satisfy indemnification obligations that we have with some of our customers. Royalty or licensing arrangements that we may seek in such circumstances may not be available to us on commercially reasonable terms or at all and we may not be able to redesign applicable products in a way to avoid infringing the intellectual property rights of others. We have made and expect to continue making significant expenditures to investigate, defend and settle claims related to the use of technology and intellectual property rights as part of our strategy to manage this risk. The medical device industry is experiencing greater scrutiny and regulation by governmental authorities. Moreover, in October 2016, we received a subpoena from the U.S. Department of Justice seeking information on our marketing and promotional practices. If governmental authorities determine that we have violated laws or regulations, including in respect of our marketing or promotional practices, our company or our employees may be subject to various penalties, including civil or criminal penalties. Our medical devices and business activities are subject to rigorous regulation by the FDA and other federal, state and foreign governmental authorities. These authorities and members of Congress have been increasing their scrutiny of the medical device industry. In recent years, the U.S. Congress, Department of Justice, the Office of Inspector General of the Department of Health and Human Services and the Department of Defense have issued subpoenas and other requests for information to medical device manufacturers, primarily related to financial arrangements with healthcare providers, regulatory compliance and product promotional practices. If we fail to comply with applicable regulatory requirements, we may be subjected to a wide variety of sanctions and enforcement actions, including warning letters that require corrective action, injunctions, product seizures or recalls, suspension of product manufacturing, revocation of approvals, exclusion from participation in government healthcare programs, civil fines, and criminal penalties. In October 2016, we received a subpoena from the U.S. Department of Justice seeking information on certain of our marketing and promotional practices. Although we are in the process of responding to the subpoena, we may not be able to resolve this matter, or similar matters that may arise in the future, without our company or employees incurring significant fines, penalties, or other adverse civil or criminal consequences. Even if we are successful in resolving the pending matter without such consequences, we have incurred, and anticipate that we will continue to incur, substantial costs in connection with the matter. The pending matter, or other governmental proceedings, could significantly impact our reputation and divert management attention and resources from growing our business, which in turn could harm our business, results of operations, financial condition and ability to obtain financing on reasonable terms or at all. We anticipate that government authorities will continue to scrutinize our industry closely, and that additional regulation by government authorities may increase compliance costs, exposure to litigation and other adverse effects on our operations. Use of our products in unapproved circumstances could expose us to liabilities. The marketing approvals from the FDA and other regulators of certain of our products are, or are expected to be, limited to specific uses. We are prohibited from marketing or promoting any unapproved use of our product. However, physicians may use these products in ways or circumstances other than those strictly within the scope of the regulatory approval. Although the product training we provide to physicians and other healthcare professionals is limited to approved uses, some physicians may be using our products in procedures that are not included in the clearance or approval of the products. Consequently, claims may be asserted by the FDA or other enforcement agencies that we are not in compliance with applicable laws or regulations, or have improperly promoted our products for uncleared or unapproved uses. The FDA or such other agencies could require a recall of 24 Table of Contents products or allege that our promotional activities misbrand or adulterate our products or violate other legal requirements, which could result in investigations, prosecutions, or other civil or criminal actions. A significant adverse change in, or failure to comply with, governing regulations could adversely affect our business, operations or financial condition. We have extensive global operations, which necessitate that we seek various regulatory approvals for our products in the jurisdictions where our products are sold. Different regulatory requirements for product approvals and our need to comply with different regulatory regimes could impact our business. Substantially all of our products are devices, as defined in the FDCA, and the manufacture, distribution, record keeping, labeling and advertisement of substantially all of our products are subject to regulation by the FDA in the United States and equivalent regulatory agencies in various foreign countries in which our products are manufactured, distributed, labeled, offered or sold. Further, we are subject to regular review and periodic inspections at our facilities with respect to compliance with the FDCA, QSR, ISO standards and similar requirements of foreign countries, which may cover, among others, the procedures and documentation of the design, testing, production, control, quality assurance, labeling, packaging, sterilization, storage and shipment of medical devices. Failure to comply with such requirements, or later discovery of previously unknown problems with our products or our third party manufacturers manufacturing processes, including any failure to take satisfactory corrective action in response to an adverse QSR inspection, could result in total or partial suspension of production or distribution, a regulatory agency refusal to grant pending or future clearances or approvals for our products, withdrawal or suspension of regulatory clearances or approvals, clinical holds, warning letters or untitled letters or refusal to permit the import or export of our products. The FDA regulatory clearance process is expensive, time consuming and uncertain, and the failure to obtain and maintain required regulatory clearances and approvals could prevent us from commercializing our products. Before we can introduce a new device or a new use of or a claim for a cleared device in the United States, we must generally obtain market clearance from the FDA through the 510(k) premarket notification process or through a PMA application, unless an exemption for lower risk devices or an alternative procedure, such as a de novo classification request or a humanitarian device exemption, applies. The FDA clearance and approval processes for medical devices are expensive, uncertain and time consuming. To obtain 501(k) clearance, a device manufacturer must submit a premarket notification to the FDA demonstrating that the device is substantially equivalent to another legally marketed predicate device. To be substantially equivalent, the notification must show that the new device has the same intended use and the same technology as the predicate device, or, if the new device has different technology, that the device is as safe and effective as the predicate device and does not raise different questions of safety and effectiveness. Performance testing is generally required to demonstrate substantial equivalence, and, for some devices, clinical data may be required. The standards and data requirements necessary for the clearance of a new device may be unclear or may be subject to change. In addition, the FDA may publish or adopt special controls it deems necessary to provide a reasonable assurance of the safety and effectiveness of a device, which might include standards for the testing and clearance of a new device. In addition to the time required to conduct clinical trials, if necessary, it usually takes between 3 months and 1 year from the date a 510(k) notification is submitted to obtain clearance, but it may take longer. The FDA may find that substantial equivalence has not been shown and, as a result, require additional clinical or non clinical testing to support a 510(k) or require the submission of a de novo classification request or PMA application for the device. A de novo classification is an alternate pathway to classify novel devices that are low to moderate risk but for which no substantially equivalent predicate device exists. Clearance of a de novo request generally takes six months to 1 year from the time of submission of the de novo request, although it can take longer. A PMA application is required for Class III devices. The application must demonstrate that there is reasonable assurance that the device is safe and effective for its intended use based on valid scientific evidence. The PMA application process generally takes several years to complete and is expensive, as it typically includes, among other things, human clinical trials, manufacturing facility inspection, bench tests, and laboratory and animal studies, which can be costly to conduct. The FDA may also require additional testing or clinical trials prior to approval or as a condition of approval. Even if the FDA approves the PMA application, it may nevertheless place restrictions on the device. If the FDA evaluation of the PMA application is not favorable, the FDA may deny approval of the PMA application or issue a not approvable letter. If human clinical trials of a medical device are required for FDA clearance or approval and the device presents a significant risk, the sponsor of the trial must file an investigational device exemption ( IDE ) application with the FDA prior to commencing such trials in the U.S.. Submission of an IDE application does not ensure that the FDA will issue the IDE. If the IDE application 25 Table of Contents is approved, there can be no assurance the FDA will determine that the data derived from the trials support the safety and effectiveness of the device or warrant the continuation of clinical trials. For clinical trials involving a device that does not present a significant risk, the sponsor is not required to obtain approval of an IDE, but the sponsor must obtain the review and approval of an institutional review board. Both significant risk and non significant risk trials are subject to additional FDA regulations, including a requirement to obtain informed consent and reporting and recordkeeping requirements. We, the FDA, or the institutional review board, may suspend a clinical trial at any time for various reasons, including a belief that the risks to study subjects outweigh the anticipated benefits. We are also required to seek FDA clearance for certain manufacturing changes, product enhancements and product line extensions, which may require new 510(k) clearance or approval of a PMA supplement. For devices marketed under an approved PMA, we must submit a PMA supplement to FDA for review and approval prior to making a change to the device that affects the safety or effectiveness of the device, including changes to the design, manufacturing or labeling of the device. Likewise, for 510(k) cleared devices, we must obtain new FDA 510(k) clearance when there is a major change or modification in the intended use or indications for use or a change or modification of the device that could significantly affect the safety or effectiveness of the device. In some cases, clinical data may be required to support a PMA supplement or 510(k) premarket notification for a device modification. The FDA requires every manufacturer to make the determination regarding the need for a new 510(k) submission or a PMA supplement in the first instance, but the FDA may review the manufacturer decisions not to seek a new 510(k) or PMA supplement. We may make changes to our cleared products without seeking additional clearances or approvals if we believe such clearances or approvals are not necessary. However, the FDA may disagree and determine that such a modified device is not substantially equivalent to the marketed device or may require additional information, including clinical data, to be submitted before a determination is made, in which case we may be required to delay the introduction and marketing of our modified products, redesign our products, conduct clinical trials to support any modifications and pay significant regulatory fines or penalties. In addition, the FDA may not approve or clear our products for the indications that are necessary or desirable for successful commercialization. There is no assurance that we will be able to obtain the necessary regulatory clearances or approvals for any product on a timely basis or at all. Further, the FDA may change its clearance and approval policies, adopt additional regulations or revise existing regulations, or take other actions which may prevent or delay approval or clearance of our products under development or impact our ability to modify our currently cleared products on a timely basis. Delays in receipt of, or failure to obtain, regulatory clearances for any product enhancements or new products we develop would result in delayed or no realization of revenue from such product enhancements or new products and in substantial additional costs, which could decrease our profitability. In addition, we are required to continue to comply with applicable FDA and other regulatory requirements once we have obtained clearance for a product. We cannot assure you that we will successfully maintain the clearances we have received or may receive in the future. In addition, our existing clearances can be revoked if any issues arise that bring into question our products safety or effectiveness. The loss of previously received clearances or approvals, or the failure to comply with existing or future regulatory requirements could also have a material adverse effect on our business. We are subject to export control laws, customs laws, sanctions laws and other laws governing our operations in the U.S. and other countries. If we fail to comply with these laws, we could be subject to civil or criminal penalties, other remedial measures and legal expenses, which could adversely affect our business, results of operations and financial condition. Our global operations expose us to trade and economic sanctions and other restrictions imposed by the United States, the European Union and other governments and organizations. The U.S. Departments of Justice, Commerce, State and Treasury and other federal agencies and authorities have a broad range of civil and criminal penalties they may seek to impose against corporations and individuals for violations of economic sanctions laws, export control laws, and other federal statutes and regulations, including those established by OFAC. Under these laws and regulations, as well as other export control laws, customs laws, sanctions laws and other laws governing our operations, various government agencies may require export licenses, may seek to impose modifications to business practices, including cessation of business activities in sancti1d countries or with sancti1d persons or entities and modifications to compliance programs, which may increase compliance costs, and may subject us to fines, penalties and other sanctions. A violation of these laws or regulations could adversely impact our business, results of operations and financial condition. Disruption of critical information systems or material breaches in the security of our systems may adversely affect our business and customer relationships. 26 Table of Contents We rely on information technology systems to process, transmit, and store electronic information in our day to day operations. We also rely on our technology infrastructure, among other functions, to interact with customers and suppliers, fulfill orders and bill, collect and make payments, ship products, provide support to customers, fulfill contractual obligations and otherwise conduct business. Our internal information technology systems, as well as those systems maintained by third party providers, may be subjected to computer viruses or other malicious codes, unauthorized access attempts, and cyber attacks, any of which could result in data leaks or otherwise compromise our confidential or proprietary information and disrupt our operations. Cyber attacks are becoming more sophisticated and frequent, and there can be no assurance that our protective measures will prevent security breaches that could have a significant impact on our business, reputation and financial results. If we fail to monitor, maintain or protect our information technology systems and data integrity effectively or fail to anticipate, plan for or manage significant disruptions to these systems, we could, among other things, lose customers, have difficulty preventing fraud, have disputes with customers, physicians, other health care professionals and other employees, be subject to regulatory sanctions or penalties, incur expenses or lose revenues or suffer other adverse consequences. Any of these events could have a material adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. The agreements and instruments governing our debt contain restrictions and limitations that could significantly affect our ability to operate our business, as well as significantly affect our liquidity. In connection with our acquisition of DFINE, we entered into a Second Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, dated July 6, 2016, with the lenders who are or may become party thereto, Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as administrative agent, swingline lender and a lender, and Wells Fargo Securities, LLC, as sole lead arranger and sole bookrunner, which was amended on September 28, 2016 (as amended, the "Second Amended Credit Agreement"). The Second Amended Credit Agreement contains a number of significant covenants that could adversely affect our ability to operate our business, our liquidity or our results of operations. These covenants restrict, among other things, our incurrence of indebtedness, creation of liens or pledges on our assets, mergers or similar combinations or liquidations, asset dispositions, repurchases or redemptions of equity interests or debt, issuances of equity, payment of dividends and certain distributions and entry into related party transactions. We have pledged substantially all of our assets as collateral for the Second Amended Credit Agreement. Our breach of any covenant in the Second Amended Credit Agreement, not otherwise cured, waived or amended, could result in a default under that agreement and could trigger acceleration of the underlying obligations. Any default under the Second Amended Credit Agreement could adversely affect our ability to service our debt and to fund our planned capital expenditures and ongoing operations. The administrative agent and lenders under the Second Amended Credit Agreement have available to them the remedies typically available to lenders and secured parties, including the ability to foreclose on the collateral we have pledged. Any default under the Second Amended Credit Agreement would at a minimum harm our ability to service our debt and to fund our prospective capital expenditures and ongoing operations. It could lead to an acceleration of indebtedness and foreclosure on our assets. The Second Amended Credit Agreement provides for a total potential borrowing base of $425.0 million, which is $100.0 million more than the aggregate amount we were permitted to borrow under our prior credit agreement. Under the terms of the Second Amended Credit Agreement, it may be more difficult for us to comply with leverage ratios and other restrictive covenants in the Second Amended Credit Agreement, compared to our prior credit agreement. We may also have less cash available for operations and investments in our business, as we will be required to use additional cash to satisfy the minimum payment obligations associated with this increased indebtedness. We will be required to expend significant resources for research, development, testing and regulatory approval or clearance of our products under development and these products may not be developed successfully or approved for commercial use. Most of our products under development will require significant additional research, development, engineering and, in some cases, preclinical and clinical testing, as well as regulatory approval or clearance and a commitment of significant additional resources prior to their commercialization. It is possible that our products may not be developed successfully; be proven safe or effective in clinical trials; offer therapeutic or other improvements over current treatments and products; meet applicable regulatory standards or receive regulatory approvals or clearances; 27 Table of Contents be capable of production in commercial quantities at acceptable costs and in compliance with regulatory requirements; be successfully marketed; or be covered by private or public insurers. We are currently conducting 3 clinical trials in an effort to obtain approval from the FDA that would enable us to expand our efforts to commercialize the QuadraSphere Microspheres, Embosphere Microspheres and EndoMAXX EVT Valved Esophageal Stent. European Union regulations do not currently require such applications for these classes of medical device. In order for us to obtain FDA approval or clearance to promote the use of QuadraSphere Microspheres, Embosphere Microspheres and EndoMAXX EVT Valved Esophageal Stent for the purposes indicated in our clinical trials, we will need to complete those trials and submit positive clinical data to the FDA. If we cannot enroll study subjects in sufficient numbers to complete the necessary studies, if there is a disruption in the supply of materials for the trials or if any other factors preclude us from completing the trials in a timely manner, we will likely not be able to complete those trials. Even if we complete any of the currently pending clinical trials, the FDA may require us to undertake additional testing, or the trial results may not be sufficient to obtain FDA approval or clearance for other reasons, including inconclusive or negative results of our trials or those conducted by our competitors or other third parties. Any clinical trials we undertake in the future will likely be subject to these and similar risks. If we do not obtain FDA approval or clearance of the product use claimed in a clinical trial, we will not be able to promote the subject product for the indicated treatment of the specific disease or condition in the United States. We are subject to laws targeting fraud and abuse in the healthcare industry, the violation of which could adversely affect our business or financial results. Our operations are subject to various state and federal laws targeting fraud and abuse in the healthcare industry, including the federal Anti Kickback Statute and other anti kickback laws, which prohibit any person from knowingly and willfully offering, paying, soliciting or receiving remuneration, directly or indirectly, to induce or reward either the referral of an individual, or the furnishing or arranging for an item or service, for which payment may be made under federal healthcare programs, such as the Medicare and Medicaid programs. Violations of these fraud and abuse related laws are punishable by criminal or civil sanctions, including substantial fines, imprisonment and exclusion from participation in healthcare programs such as Medicare and Medicaid, any of which could harm our business or financial results. We are also subject to the FCPA, the U.K. Bribery Act, and similar anti bribery laws in non U.S. jurisdictions. These laws generally prohibit companies and their intermediaries from illegally offering things of value to any individual for the purpose of obtaining or retaining business. As we continue to expand our business activities internationally, compliance with the FCPA and other anti bribery laws presents greater challenges to our operations. If our employees or agents violate the provisions of the FCPA or other anti bribery laws, we may incur fines or penalties, which could have a material adverse effect on our operating results or financial condition. Healthcare reform legislation has negatively affected our financial results and may have a material adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. The PPACA was enacted into law in March 2010, and most of the core pieces of the PPACA are now in effect. Certain other provisions of the legislation are not scheduled to become effective for a number of years. There are many programs and requirements for which the details have not yet been fully established or consequences not fully understood, and it is unclear what the full impact of the legislation will be. The law imposes on medical device manufacturers a 23% excise tax on U.S. sales of certain medical devices. Although this tax was suspended for the 2016 and 2017 tax years, during the year ended December 31, 2015 we incurred $4.3 million related to this tax, which reduced our gross profit by 0.8%. We cannot predict whether the suspension will be continued beyond 2017. In addition, the costs of compliance with the PPACA reporting and disclosure requirements, frequently identified as the Sunshine Act, with regard to payments or other transfers of value made to healthcare providers may have a material, negative impact on our results of operations and our cash flows. Judicial challenges to, as well as legislative and executive initiatives to modify, limit, or repeal, the PPACA have been initiated and continue. For instance, in January 2017, President Trump issued an executive order which, among other things, stated that 1 of the priorities of the current administration is to seek prompt repeal of the PPACA and instructed all executive departments and branches to exercise their authority and discretion to minimize the economic and regulatory burdens of the PPACA to the maximum extent permitted by law. 28 Table of Contents We also currently market, and intend to continue to market, our products in Europe. To market our products in the Member States of the European Economic Area ( EEA ) under the CE conformity mark, our devices are required to comply with the essential requirements, including a completion of a conformity assessment procedure which varies in severity based on the type and classification of the medical device, of the EU Medical Devices Directives (Council Directive 93 42 EEC of 14 June 1993 concerning medical devices, as amended). Since 2012, the European authorities have been working on a reform of the E.U. regulatory framework for medical devices. A final proposal for a new regulation (the Medical Devices Regulation ) has been agreed upon by the European Commission and the European Parliament in June 2016 and is expected to be formally approved and enter into force in the first half of 2017 and become applicable 3 years thereafter. The adoption of the Medical Devices Regulation may, however, be materially delayed. In its current form it would, among other things, impose additional reporting requirements on manufacturers of high risk medical devices, impose an obligation on manufacturers to appoint a qualified person responsible for regulatory compliance, and provide for more strict clinical evidence requirements. These new rules and procedures may result in increased regulatory oversight of any future high risk devices that we may develop and this may, in turn, increase the costs, time and requirements that need to be met in order to maintain or place such devices on the EEA market. We cannot predict what healthcare programs and regulations will be ultimately implemented at the federal or state level, or the effect of any future legislation or regulation in the U.S. or internationally. However, any changes, or uncertainty with respect to potential changes, that lower reimbursements for our products or reduce medical procedure volumes could harm our business and results of operations. As we cannot ultimately predict the long term effect of the PPACA provisions as they are implemented, any changes to healthcare reform that lower reimbursement amounts for our products could harm our business, results of operation or financial condition. We are dependent upon key personnel. Our success is dependent on key management personnel, including Fred P. Lampropoulos, our Chairman of the Board, President and Chief Executive Officer. Mr. Lampropoulos is not subject to any agreement prohibiting his departure, and we do not maintain key man life insurance on his life. The loss of Mr. Lampropoulos, or of certain other key management personnel, could have a materially adverse effect on our business and operations. Our success also depends on, among other factors, the successful recruitment and retention of key operating, manufacturing, sales and other personnel. Our products may be subject to product liability claims. Our products are used in connection with invasive procedures and in other medical contexts that entail an inherent risk of product liability claims. If medical personnel or their patients suffer injury or death in connection with the use of our products, whether as a result of a failure of our products to function as designed, an inappropriate design, inadequate disclosure of product related risks or information, improper use, or for any other reason, we could be subject to lawsuits seeking significant compensatory and punitive damages. Product liability claims may be brought by individuals or by groups seeking to represent a class. We have previously faced claims by patients claiming injuries from our products. To date, these claims have not resulted in material harm to our operations or financial condition. The outcome of this type of personal injury litigation is difficult to assess or quantify. We maintain product liability insurance; however, there is no assurance that this coverage will be sufficient to satisfy any claim made against us. Moreover, any product liability claim brought against us could result in significant costs, divert our management attention from other business matters or operations, increase our product liability insurance rates, or prevent us from securing insurance coverage in the future. As a result, any lawsuit seeking significant m1tary damages may have a material adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. In addition, the occurrence of such an event or claim could result in a recall of products from the market or a safety alert relating to such products. Such a recall could result in significant costs, reduce our revenue, divert management's attention from our business, and harm our reputation. Our products may cause or contribute to adverse medical events that we are required to report to the FDA, and if we fail to do so, we may be subject to sanctions that may materially harm our business. Our products are subject to medical device reporting ( MDR ) regulations, which require us to report to the FDA any incident in which our products may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury, or in which our products malfuncti1d and, if the malfunction were to recur, it could likely cause or contribute to a death or serious injury. Our obligation to report under the MDR regulations is triggered on the date on which we become aware of an adverse event and the nature of the event. We may fail to report adverse events of which we become aware within the prescribed timeframe. We may also fail to recognize that we have become aware of a reportable adverse event, especially if it is not reported to us as an adverse event or if it is an adverse event that is unexpected or if the product characteristic that caused the adverse event is removed in time from our products. If we fail to comply with our MDR reporting obligations, the FDA could issue warning letters or untitled letters, take administrative 29 Table of Contents actions, commence criminal prosecution, impose civil m1tary penalties, revoke our device clearances, seize our products, or delay the clearance of our future products. We generally offer a limited warranty for the return of product due to defects in quality and workmanship. We attempt to estimate our potential liability for future product returns and establish reserves on our financial statements in amounts that we believe will be sufficient to address our warranty obligations; however, our actual liability for product returns may significantly exceed the amount of our reserves. If we underestimate our potential liability for future product returns, or if unanticipated events result in returns that exceed our historical experience, our financial condition and operating results could be materially harmed. We lack direct sales and marketing capabilities in many countries, and are wholly dependent on our distributors for the commercialization of our products in these countries. If we are unable to maintain or establish sales capabilities on our own or through third parties, we may not be able to commercialize any of our products in those countries. We have no or limited direct sales or marketing capabilities in some of the regions and countries in which our products are sold, including, among others, China, Russia and Japan. We have entered into distribution agreements with third parties to market and sell our products in those countries in which we do not have a direct sales force and in those countries in which we utilize a "modified direct" sales approach. If we are unable to maintain or enter into such distribution arrangements on acceptable terms, or at all, we may not be able to successfully commercialize our products in certain countries. Moreover, to the extent that we enter into distribution arrangements with other companies, our revenues, if any, will depend on the terms of any such arrangements and the efforts of others. These efforts may turn out not to be sufficient and our third party distributors may not effectively sell our products. In addition, although our contract terms require our distributors to comply with all applicable laws regarding the sale of our products, including anti competition, anti corruption, anti m1y laundering and sanctions laws, we may not be able to ensure proper compliance. If our distributors fail to effectively market and sell our products in full compliance with applicable laws, our results of operations and business could be impacted. Our employees, independent contractors, consultants, manufacturers and distributors may engage in misconduct or other improper activities, including noncompliance with regulatory standards and requirements. We are exposed to the risk that our employees, independent contractors, consultants, manufacturers and distributors may engage in fraudulent conduct or other illegal activity. Misconduct by these parties could include intentional, reckless or negligent conduct or disclosure of unauthorized activities to us that violates healthcare laws and regulations of the FDA and other federal, state and international authorities, manufacturing standards, and laws that require the true, complete and accurate reporting of financial information or data. We have adopted a code of business conduct and ethics, but it is not always possible to identify and deter misconduct, and the precautions we take to detect and prevent this activity may not be effective in controlling unknown or unmanaged risks or losses or in protecting us from governmental investigations or other actions or lawsuits stemming from a failure to be in compliance with such laws or regulations. If any such actions are instituted against us, and we are not successful in defending ourselves or asserting our rights, those actions could have a significant impact on our business, including the imposition of significant civil, criminal and administrative penalties. The size of the market for our product groups has not been established with precision, and may be smaller than we estimate. Our estimates of the annual total addressable market for our cardiovascular and endoscopy market segments are based on a number of internal and third party estimates, including published industry data. While we believe these factors have historically provided and may continue to provide us with effective tools in estimating the total market for our products, these estimates may not be correct and the conditions supporting our estimates may change at any time, thereby reducing the predictive accuracy of the underlying factors we consider in our analysis. As a result, our estimates of the annual total addressable market for our products may prove to be incorrect. If the actual number of patients who would benefit from our products and the annual total addressable market for our products is smaller than we have estimated, our sales growth may be impaired and our business adversely impacted. Consolidation in the healthcare industry, group purchasing organizations or public procurement policies could lead to demands for price concessions, which may impact our ability to sell our products at prices necessary to support our current business strategies. Healthcare costs have risen significantly over the past decade, which has resulted in or led to numerous cost reform initiatives by legislators, regulators and third party payers. Cost reform has triggered a consolidation trend in the healthcare industry to aggregate purchasing power, which may create more requests for pricing concessions in the future. Additionally, group purchasing organizations, independent delivery ne2rks, public procurement policies and large single accounts may continue to use their market power to consolidate purchasing decisions for hospitals and healthcare service providers. We expect that market demand, 30 Table of Contents government regulation, third party coverage and reimbursement policies and societal pressures will continue to change the healthcare industry worldwide, resulting in further business consolidations and alliances among our customers, which may exert further downward pressure on the prices of our products. We may be unable to compete in our markets, particularly if there is a significant change in relevant practices or technology. The markets in which our products compete are highly competitive. We face competition from many companies which are larger, better established, have greater financial, technical and other resources and possess a greater market presence than we do. Such resources and market presence may enable our competitors to more effectively market competing products or to market competing products at reduced prices in order to gain market share. In addition, our ability to compete successfully is dependent, in part, upon our response to changes in technology and upon our efforts to develop and market new products which achieve significant market acceptance. Competing companies with substantially greater resources than us are actively engaged in research and development of new methods, treatments, drugs, and procedures to treat or prevent cardiovascular disease that could limit the market for our products and eventually make some of our products obsolete. A reduction in the demand for a significant number of our products, or a few key products, could have a material adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. Fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates may negatively impact our financial results. As our operations have grown outside the United States, we have also become increasingly subject to market risk relating to foreign currency. Those fluctuations could have a negative impact on our margins and financial results. For example, during 2016 and 2015, the exchange rate between all applicable foreign currencies and the U.S. Dollar resulted in a decrease in our net sales of approximately $4.9 million and $113 million, respectively. For the year ended December 31, 2016, approximately $154.3 million, or 26%, of our net sales were denominated in foreign currencies, with our Euro denominated sales representing our largest single currency risk. If the rate of exchange between foreign currencies declines against the U.S. Dollar, we may not be able to increase the prices we charge our customers for products whose prices are denominated in those respective foreign currencies. Furthermore, we may be unable or elect not to enter into hedging transactions which could mitigate the effect of declining exchange rates. As a result, if the rate of exchange between foreign currencies declines against the U.S. Dollar, our financial results may be negatively impacted. Termination or interruption of our supply relationships or increases in the price of our comp1nt parts, finished products, third party services or raw materials, particularly petroleum based products, could have an adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. We rely on raw materials, comp1nt parts, finished products and third party services in connection with our business. For example, substantially all of our products are sterilized by only a few different entities. Additionally, many of our products have comp1nts that are manufactured using resins, plastics and other petroleum based materials which are available from a limited number of suppliers. We are experiencing a growing trend among suppliers of polymer resins to refuse to supply resin to the medical device manufacturers or to require such manufacturers to assume additional risks due to the potential for product liability claims. Additionally, there is no assurance that crude oil supplies will be uninterrupted or that petroleum based manufacturing materials will be available for purchase in the future. Any interruption to the supply of polymers or petroleum based resins could have an adverse effect on our ability to produce, or on the cost to produce, our products. The availability and price of these materials is affected by a variety of factors beyond our control, including the willingness of suppliers to sell into the medical device industry, changes in supply and demand, general economic conditions, labor costs, fuel related transportation costs, competition, import duties, tariffs, currency exchange rates and political uncertainty around the world. Our suppliers may pass some of their cost increases on to us, and if such increased costs are sustained or increase further, our suppliers may pass further cost increases on to us. In addition to the effect on resin prices, transportation costs generally increase based on the effect of higher crude oil prices, and these increased transportation costs may be passed on to us. Our ability to recover such increased costs may depend upon our ability to raise prices on our products. Due to the highly competitive nature of the healthcare industry and the cost containment efforts of our customers and third party payers, we may be unable to pass along cost increases through higher prices. If we are unable to fully recover these costs through price increases or offset these increases through cost reductions or we experience terminations or interruption of our relationships with our suppliers we could experience lower margins and profitability, and our results of operations, financial condition and cash flows could be materially harmed. 31 Table of Contents We may be unable to accurately forecast customer demand for our products and manage our inventory, including rapid increases in the demand for our products, particularly if the increase may not be sustained. To ensure adequate supply, we must forecast our inventory needs and place orders with our suppliers based on estimates of future demand for particular products. Our ability to accurately forecast demand for our products could be negatively affected by many factors, including our failure to accurately manage our expansion strategy and customer acceptance of new products, product introductions by our competitors, an increase or decrease in customer demand for our products or for products of our competitors, unanticipated changes in general market conditions or regulatory matters and weakening of economic conditions or consumer confidence in future economic conditions. Inventory levels in excess of customer demand may result in inventory write downs or write offs, which would impact our gross margin. Conversely, if we underestimate customer demand for our products, our manufacturing facilities may not be able to deliver products to meet our order requirements, which could damage our reputation and customer relationships. In particular, due to regulatory issues experienced by a competitor during the year ended December 31, 2016 we experienced an increase in demand for certain of our products. We do not know whether this increase will be short term, medium term or sustained, nor can we presently estimate the amount of the increase. As a result of this increase, demand for those products may exceed our inventory and manufacturing capacity. In response to the development, we have increased capacity at some of our existing facilities however, this increase may not be sufficient to meet demand and could place stress on our human and other resources. It may also place stress on our relationships with third party suppliers. In the short term, we cannot outsource this manufacturing because our products need to be manufactured to exact specifications, in a clean environment and by a manufacturer that satisfies certain regulatory requirements. This is forcing us to make allocation decisions among existing and new customers. We may be unable to efficiently manage this increase in demand for certain products. In addition, such products are lower margin products and the increase in sales of the products may reduce our gross margins. Failure to efficiently manage the situation could result in the loss of skilled employees or damage our existing supply relationships. A rapid increase in production may also lead to failures in our internal controls, including those related to quality, operations, or financial reporting. Any such failures on our part may result in long term declines in our profitability and results of operations. International and national economic and industry conditions constantly change, and could harm our business and results of operations. Our business and our results of operation are affected by many changing economic, industry and other conditions beyond our control, including, for instance, potential changes to the economic relationship between the United States and Mexico, China, and other countries in which we operate as a result of the new U.S. administration, and other changes and developments that we cannot anticipate, each of which could harm our business and results of operations. Actual or potential changes in international, national, regional and local economic, business and financial conditions, including recession, inflation and trade protection measures, may negatively affect consumer preferences, perceptions, spending patterns or demographic trends, any of which could harm our business or results of operations. Our customers may experience financial difficulties or be unable to borrow m1y to fund their operations, which may harm their ability or decision to purchase or pay for our products. Disruptions in the credit markets have previously resulted, and could again result, in volatility, decreased liquidity, widening of credit spreads, and reduced availability of financing. There can be no assurance that future financing will be available to us on acceptable terms, if at all. An inability to obtain necessary additional financing on acceptable terms may have an adverse impact on us and on our ability to implement our business plan. In particular, the new U.S. Administration has called for and may introduce substantial changes to fiscal, healthcare, trade and tax policies and legislation, which may include comprehensive tax reform and changes to existing trade agreements, including, but not limited to, the North American Free Trade Agreement ( NAFTA ). Such changes may have a significant impact on our operations and financial results. In particular, the potential enactment of tariffs on goods imported into the U.S., including but not limited to, goods imported from Mexico where we manufacture many of our products that we sell internationally, could adversely affect our gross profit margins. If enacted, any legislation by the U.S. federal government that restricts trade, such as tariffs, trade barriers, and other protectionist or retaliatory measures taken by governments in Europe, Asia, and other regions, could adversely impact our ability to sell products and services internationally. We cannot predict the impact, if any, of these changes to our business. If economic conditions worsen or fail to improve, changes in legislation impact the relationship between the U.S. and Mexico and other countries in which we operate or the continuity of NAFTA and other trade agreements, or new legislation is passed related to the healthcare system, fiscal or tax policies, customer demand may not materialize to the levels we require to achieve our anticipated financial results, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, results of operations, or cash flows. On June 23, 2016, the United Kingdom held a referendum in which voters approved an exit from the European Union ( Brexit ). As a result of the referendum, negotiations are under way to determine the future terms of the United Kingdom 32 Table of Contents relationship with the European Union, including the terms of trade. It is possible that there will be greater restrictions on the movement of goods and people between the United Kingdom and the European Union countries and increased regulatory complexities, which could affect our ability to sell products in certain European Union countries and in the United Kingdom. Brexit could adversely affect European and worldwide economic and market conditions and could further contribute to instability in global financial and foreign exchange markets, including volatility in the value of the British pound and Euro, to which we have significant exposure. In addition, other European countries may seek to conduct referenda with respect to continuing membership with the European Union. We do not know to what extent such changes will impact our business. All of the above developments, and others that we cannot anticipate, could adversely affect our business, operations and financial results. We depend on generating sufficient cash flow to fund our debt obligations, capital expenditures, and ongoing operations. We are dependent on our cash on hand and free cash flow to fund our debt obligations, capital expenditures and ongoing operations. Our ability to service our debt and to fund our planned capital expenditures and ongoing operations will depend on our ability to continue to generate cash flow. If we are unable to generate sufficient cash flow or we are unable to access additional liquidity sources, we may not be able to service or repay our debt, operate our business, respond to competitive challenges, or fund our other liquidity and capital needs. A significant portion of our revenues is derived from a few products and medical procedures. A significant portion of our revenues is attributable to sales of our inflation devices. During the year ended December 31, 2016, sales of our inflation devices (including inflation devices sold in custom kits and through OEM channels) accounted for approximately 12% of our net sales. Any material decline in market demand, or change in OEM supplier preference, for our inflation devices could have an adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. In addition, the products that have accounted for a majority of our historical revenues are designed for use in connection with a few related medical procedures, including angioplasty, stent placement procedures, and spinal procedures. If subsequent developments in medical technology or drug therapy make such procedures obsolete, or alter the methodology of such procedures so as to eliminate the usefulness of our products, we may experience a material decrease in demand for our products and experience deteriorating financial performance. The market price of our common stock has been, and may continue to be, volatile. The market price of our common stock has at times been, and may in the future be, volatile for various reasons, including those discussed in these risks factors, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. Other events that could cause volatility in our stock, include without limitation, variances in our financial results; analysts and other projections or recommendations regarding our common stock specifically or medical technology stocks generally; any restatement of our financial statements or any investigation of us by the SEC, the FDA or another regulatory authority; or a decline, or rise, of stock prices in the capital markets generally. We are subject to work stoppage, transportation, severe weather, natural disasters and related risks. We manufacture products at various locations in the United States and foreign countries and sell our products worldwide. We depend on third party transportation companies to deliver supplies necessary to manufacture our products from vendors to our various facilities and to move our products to customers, operating divisions, and other subsidiaries located worldwide. Our manufacturing operations, and the operations of the transportation companies on which we depend, may be harmed by natural disasters or significant human events, such as a war, civil unrest, terrorist attack, riot, strike, slowdown, or similar events. Any disruption in our manufacturing or transportation could materially harm our ability to meet customer demands or our operations. Furthermore, our manufacturing operations could be affected by many other factors beyond our control, including severe weather conditions and natural disasters, including hurricanes, earthquakes and tornadoes. These conditions could cause substantial damage to our facilities, interrupt our production and disrupt our ability to deliver products to our customers. Fluctuations in our effective tax rate may adversely affect our business, financial condition or results of operation. We are subject to taxation in numerous countries, states and other jurisdictions. Our effective tax rate is derived from a combination of applicable tax rates in the various countries, states and other jurisdictions in which we operate. In preparing our financial statements, we estimate the amount of tax that will become payable in each of these jurisdictions. Our effective tax rate 33 Table of Contents may, however, differ from the estimated amount due to numerous factors, including a change in the mix of our profitability from country to country and changes in tax laws. Relevant authorities may also disagree with tax positions we have taken and assess further taxes. Proposals for broad reform of the existing United States corporate tax system are under evaluation by various legislative and administrative bodies. In addition, further changes in the tax laws of foreign jurisdictions could arise, including as a result of recommendations issued by the Organisation for Economic Cooperation and Development, or the OECD, which could, if implemented, result in substantial changes to numerous long standing tax positions and principles. These contemplated changes, to the extent adopted by OECD members or other countries, could increase tax uncertainty and may adversely affect our provision for income taxes. Any of these factors could cause us to experience an effective tax rate significantly different from previous periods or our current expectations, which could have an adverse effect on our business, financial condition or results of operation. Limits on reimbursement imposed by governmental and other programs may adversely affect our business and results of operation. We sell our products to hospitals and other healthcare providers around the world that typically receive reimbursement for the services provided to patients from third party payers such as government programs (e.g., Medicare and Medicaid in the U.S.) and private insurance programs. The ability of our customers to obtain appropriate reimbursement for the cost of our products from governmental and private third party payers is critical to our business. Limits on reimbursement imposed by such programs may adversely affect the ability of hospitals and others to purchase our products, which could adversely affect our business and results of operations. Third party payers, whether foreign or domestic, or governmental or commercial, are developing increasingly sophisticated methods of controlling healthcare costs. In general, a third party payer covers a medical procedure only when the plan administrator is satisfied that the product or procedure is reasonable and necessary to the patient treatment; however, the cost effectiveness of the treatment may also be a condition. In addition, in the United States, no uniform policy of coverage and reimbursement for procedures using our products exists among third party payers. Therefore, coverage and reimbursement for procedures using our products can differ significantly from payer to payer. In addition, payers continually review new and existing technologies for possible coverage and can, without notice, deny or reverse coverage or alter pre authorization requirements for new or existing products and procedures. We cannot provide assurance that we will be successful in any efforts we may potentially undertake to reverse such non coverage decisions. If we are not successful in reversing non coverage policies, or if third party payers that currently cover or reimburse certain procedures reverse or limit their coverage of such procedures in the future, or if other third party payers issue similar policies, our business could be adversely impacted. Further, we believe that future coverage and reimbursement may be subject to increased restrictions, such as additional preauthorization requirements, both in the United States and in international markets. Third party coverage and reimbursement for procedures using our products or any of our products in development for which we may receive regulatory approval may not be available or adequate in either the United States or international markets, which could have an adverse impact on our business. Our failure to comply with applicable environmental laws and regulations could affect our business, operations or financial condition. We manufacture and assemble certain products that require the use of hazardous materials that are subject to various national, federal, state and local laws and regulations governing the protection of the environment, health and safety. While the cost of compliance with such laws and regulations has not had a material adverse effect on our results of operations historically, compliance with future regulations may require additional capital investments. Additionally, because we use hazardous and other regulated materials in our manufacturing processes, we are subject to certain risks of future liabilities, lawsuits and claims resulting from any substances we manufacture, dispose of or release. Any accidental release may have an adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. We cannot predict what additional environmental, health and safety legislation or regulations will be enacted or become effective in the future or how existing or future laws or regulations will be administered or interpreted with respect to our operations, capital expenditures, results of operations or competitive position. Compliance with more stringent laws or regulations or adverse changes in the interpretation of existing laws or regulations by government agencies could have a material adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition, and could require substantial expenditures. Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments. N1 Item 2 Item 2 Properties.
